I’m interested to know if you’ve found your passion and purpose in life. Tell me about it!
3. I like cats, but I love dogs and I’m freakin’ terrified of Chickens. Oh I took up Veterinary Medicine in College. I hated Poultry Class.
With hard people intimacy is shameful thing—and something precious.
Country : France, UK
My husband was never diagnosed as a psychopath but what else do you call someone who appears charming, witty and friendly in public and nasty, miserable and cruel behind closed doors. What other name is there for someone who acts like he has his “lid on tightly” to everyone in public and even as he closes the car door in front of all your friends or relatives, utters under his breath, “You fucken cunt, look what you made me do now” as he stamps on the gas pedal because he had an anxiety attack about looking someone in the eye again in case they could see through to him wishing them dead.
by the way, i am making these next Halloween. they're so easy! don't let me forget.
Once she finished molesting my life, we realized that stupidly, we didn't check the bag with all of our toiletries in it. So even though we could have fit it in the big bag we had previously checked, we didn't think about the fact that you can't bring all that shampoo, conditioner, etc. on a plane. You know, in case I made a Panteen Pro-V bomb or some shit like that. So we had to go back to the front gate to check the bag, go back through the body scanner for another nudey skeleton picture for creepy Joe in the back, and I got to be molested all over again by the odd looking TSA agent. Awesome.
Creations. I've authored regular features and three year long series of published articles, "What's Your Style?"and "Scrapping with the Stars" (astrology and scrapping). More recently, "Reality Bites" (scrapping about real life issues).
"Guess not. I'll have a pint of lager please Greenie".
On the day of my book club, I didn't know if I could pull off a reasonable effort at making a work of art. However, the older I get the more I am saying "get over it," and soldiering onward. And this I did.
No comparison, but victory
props, etc. and set up the base of my display.
After years of lying to myself, I came to the conclusion that I really needed to actually TRY to lose weight, to make lifestyle changes. I stopped drinking soda, stopped hitting the fast food joints when I was stuck in my car doing home visits, and would pack a lunch that wouldn’t spoil after being in my car all morning instead. I learned how to cook healthy meals for one and prepare food that I could put in the freezer and then heat up after long days at work when I didn’t feel like cooking when I got home. I STOPPED letting the excuse of my medication be my crutch to not lose weight and get healthy. I also decided to start getting back into working out. Here’s where this story starts to get good.
I could tell you all of that, but over the next few years you will discover this for yourselves. So all I will tell you is this;
To blame any parent for this kind of tragic loss of a child is cruel. To single out smokers without evidence is wicked.
Kelly McGillis will always be one of my favorite leading ladies. My early cinematic crush has grown into a long-lived admiration for an actress who has endured a lot and still come out on top, in life if not on-screen. That said, I hope to see more of her in the movie theater and on TV in the years that come. Until then, we’ll always have Witness.
And did the Countenance Divine
Btw, what will we call the awards for the programming in this arena ? Digital Emmy awards or in short, Dimmy awards ?
In the midst of media hoopla about another technology being laid to rest–namely the end of the space shuttle program–there was a lesser-told story in the news this week about the centenary of one of the more technologically engaged and provocative thinkers of recent years: Marshall McLuhan (1911-1980). Coming from a background in literature, McLuhan has exerted a significant influence over media studies for decades since his death in 1980. Adequate bios and overview of McLuhan and his work can be found here and here, and an interesting 1967 New York Times piece is here. Douglas Coupland (author of Generation X, Life After God, and Generation A) recently published his own quirky biography, Marshall McLuhan (see a review at the National Post, here).
5. The lady to your right is blonde and a professional wrestler. Now, think about it seriously, Mister. Do you still wanna tell that joke?"
Truth: Even if you’re not married and don’t have children, you should still consider whether you need life insurance. Others may still depend on you, such as parents, and life insurance can cover expenses such as funeral arrangements and potential debts, explains Blake.
My hormones are going insane. They are by far stronger than I have had in my previous pregnancy's. Not sure if this is b/c we started this process using hormone supplements and thus triggering my body to stay at a higher level or if it's just b/c every pregnancy is different, but either way I am feeling them. I have never been a crazy pregnant woman before so this is all new territory for me haha. Recognizing that my feelings can not be trusted has really helped in my day to day management of them, but it doesn't really help those feelings go away. I find myself irritable and weepy over the most ridiculous things. Thankfully I have more days of normal me than I do of crazy me and our summer is booking up fast so I'm sure the last 8 weeks will just fly by. I'm realizing that summer is a great time to be pregnant. Yes it's hot, but there is so much to do and so little time to dwell on the time that's ticking by. I'm hoping that before we all know it Ali and Ben will have their baby in their arms :)
Wand of Magic Missiles: I prefer this version of the wand more then later editions where they connect the power to the level of the person who made it. In this version the wand can fire 1 or 2 missiles a round at the users choice and each missile uses a charge. Quite useful at any level as in LL Magic Missile does 1d6+1 a missile and never misses so it can be used for some reliable damage while not being overpowered.
Genetic modifications engineered by Monsanto makes their products bigger and more aesthetically pleasing. Another, less discussed “improvement” is the plants’ ability to withstand nearly unlimited amounts of Roundup brand pesticides. This encourages farmers to use that brand of pesticides which is produced by … Monsanto.
Amergy Bank, San Antonio, TX
How can you look in your fellow citizen’s eyes and lie, lie, lie, lie…to them?
With an issue as polarizing as “rights for homosexuals,” of course opinions run strong and deep on both sides. Count ESPN’s Rick Reilly as one of those with a strong and deep opinion against Brown and his activism. Reilly’s method of skewering Brown is a familiar one. Find an honor roll, all-American type student at Nebraska to use as an example and then paint Brown as a homophobic neanderthal:
4) I collect teapots and all sorts of tea paraphernalia.
Publisher:Hathi Chiti Books for Kids
Ah, dear ones who wonder and wait. We do attend to the littlest ones and the ones who have no voice. We attend to the animals and the sea creatures too. We reach out to all and speak the language of the heart to all. You know this and feel this. You are the most stubborn of all creation. Yet, you are also the most treasured. You and only you can think and feel and know. You can create and form. You are so wonderful. You too can reach out and touch into the hearts and souls of others. You must be mindful of the power you possess to do this. And be ever watchful that you are only producing love. For yourself, to yourself and to others; all others.
indeed been built into the core of Sigur Rós ever since the days of ‘Von’. Each
two suspects during a
Okay — he sounds a little hokey. But only because we’ve become so divorced from the idea that we can stand a little discomfort that we dismiss the idea that we really COULD be happier while sweatier.
So! Congrats to Zhao Jia’s team – herself, Ah Le, Nat, Suu, Guan, Jin, Jiayi (Tan :D) – for putting up that awesome performance (I still haven’t got over your GPS aka Golden Piggy Ass #traumatisedforlife) yeah :D Even the ACS doods clapped for you and laughed at your jokes #accomplishmentunlocked Also, grats to Jasmine’s team – herself, Shing, Elame, Qhwee, Val, Alysia, Lydie- for getting to world finals! You put up a brilliant show and it was perfect – the recent script change did nothing to affect it-! Not to mention to BA-TUM-TSS scene change. I mean like, WHOA.
Then in the seventh grade came even worse bullying, the bullying of the queen bee female kind. The whispers, the looks, and finally, getting tripped down the stairwell between classes.
I read Majestrum after reading The Spiral Labyrinth and Hespira, and I was a bit surprised to find it wasn’t the beginning of the Henghis Hapthorn story (although it works perfectly well as a standalone novel). Similarly, you mentioned earlier the Luff Imbry novel, which follows on from short stories and novellas. That’s quite an unusual approach, reminding me in a way of how indie bands like Stereolab and New Order would leave singles off their albums; it encourages a certain kind of fan. Was that approach the result of a deliberate decision, or is it just how it’s worked out?
10:30 - Work on Sisterhood Sentinel, and then prepare for next week's Sunday School Lesson
Then they turn their eyes on the other tourists...
“Among others assaulted or had their cameras damaged or memory cards confiscated were journalists from Nanyang, Channel News Asia, Al Jazeera, Makkal Osai and Merdeka Review,” he added.
Director - Joost Vandebrug
But sometimes that works out better for all involved.
and you want to keep it simple? Try some...
For instance the RC can also be hooked up with other interesting items that make the game extremely interesting to play.
“Great working with you guys!”
The stock market crashes in 1929. Eighty years later, in 2008, it does the same thing.
Glaze:
Trying ta make a livin' an' doin' the best I ca-an,
Having said all of this, my conclusion is that precedent was set with the very institution of the Wild Card rule and that the rule that is currently in effect has absolutely NOTHING to do with setting one’s “qualification” for Worlds.. Therefore my conclusion is that USATF should simply disband the rule altogether as it really serves no useful purpose! And Merritt, or any other athlete should be the Wild Card pass that they earned when they finished first in the previous World Championships.
"And the cover will look like this."
A story,
7. Anxiety is worldly.
That’s all for now, but as I always say, “Watch this Space.”
I wouldn't mind but I spent ages stretching out after my workout.
Thank you for doing xyz, even though it isn't your favorite. I appreciate it.
For those vegetarians and vegans out there, Brandan Brazier has written Thrive Foods: 200 Plant-Based Recipes for Peak Health ($20.00, Da Capo Press, softcover). It is also fairly idiotic in that he is so environmentally correct, the author discusses what foods use the least amount of natural resources to produce, require little “of our dwindling water supply, and cause a minimal amount of pollution.” Does any really care about such things when putting together the evening meal? Does it matter to anyone that farmers are probably more concerned about such things than you? They are not in the business of running up the water bill if Mother Nature will provide some rain. They are not in the business of polluting the food crops on which they depend. That said, there are some 200 recipes in this book, but you’d probably enjoy even tastier ones if you bought another cookbook. That brings me to Joanne Fluke’s Lake Eden Cookbook ($18.95, Kensington Publishing Corp). Fluke is best known for her mysteries featuring Minnesota bake shop owner Hannah Swensen. The cookbook is a compilation of recipes from mysteries and some vignettes involving the fictional Lake Eden characters. Fluke’s novels have names like “Cherry Cheesecake Murder” and “Key Lime Pie Murder.” All very entertaining for sure, particularly for fans of her novels, but the recipes are mouth-wateringly good and are mostly traditional favorites of every description cookies, cakes and pies. This one’s a keeper.
I tried to give a bit of a fur effect to the colouring of the rabbit using promarkers and prisma pencils. Not sure you can see it that clearly here but does look quite effective. Still need a bit more practice though. I am afraid the photo does not really show the lovely colours in the papers, lovely blues, greens, pinks and browns.
(1) Is too expensive!
Speaking of fuel, that's another con. You'd use more and then you'd be ragging Mother Nature. However, if 80 is already common practise, surely it won't make a difference anyway?
zest from one orange (optional)
B52’s
11. Jugular
Finally all the parts are complete and in place on the temporary footing for my coliseum facade. I have a bit more staining to do … maybe. Now it’s down to digging the footing. I got the outline dug out last week and removed the sod … the hard part awaits the end of this humidity we’ve been having the last few days. At least I have been able to start stockpiling some concrete for it … close to half .. I think.
A very common thread, however, is that professors are becoming disillusioned by the lack of maturity of undergraduate students. This semester seems to be the worst, by my observation, for professors spelling out the rules that should be common sense. Cell phones must be completely off and cannot be out during class. Assignments must be turned in on time. Excuses that will be accepted for missed exams and assignments are very narrow. Extra credit is no longer being offered because of past abuses by previous classes.
(When you get used to doing this, you can insert a blog button in a matter of seconds!)
maybe a year ago by now.
I took the hinges off of my shutter. I played around with it to get an idea of what I wanted it to look like.
As always - thanks for stopping by.
Final Thoughts
i thought this food fickle ridiculousness was for infants.
I want to feed the hungry, comfort the hurting.
we were too busy for carving this year (terrible, I know).
* Speak to the advantages, disadvantages, and challenges of the technology, so the teachers and students have a context to think about it.
This technique gives the mural depth (even if it's cartoony like the jungle mural). This is done by creating a sense of atmosphere. When you go outside and look at something far away, it actually looks bluer than objects that are close to you. This is because of all the "atmosphere" that is between you and the object. It's the same stuff that makes the sky look blue. You can play with the amounts; just know mixing the two colors will help you achieve dimension in your painting!
Accessories: Rich Razzleberry Satin Ribbon, Dimensionals, SU Anywhere Glue Stick (I had run out of SNAIL...that will never happen again, though our Glue Sticks are phenomenal!)
twirled
*Began first grade (first year of all day/every day), she is handling it like a champ and still prefers to have an 1 1/2 nap immediately after school, which gives us all a little more (less whiny, less crying) family time at night :)
And my bible was collecting dust on the shelf,
VxVM INFO V-5-2-1263
The detail is marvelous and this picture doesn't do it justice (so go check out his website).
Several months ago I was meeting a friend at a sports bar for dinner and drinks. I happened to get there before she did and while I was waiting I decided to go and sit in the bar section and was seated near the end of the table next to a party of guys.
After helping legitimize Lobo's presidency, U.S. media ignored the
Eclectic Music Fest
Wednesday, 05 December 2007
He pastors a church, leads an evangelistic healing and deliverance ministry, and hosts a weekly broadcast, “Avivamiento Del Rey,” on Radio Vida, a local Christian station in McAllen, Texas, just across the border from Reynosa, Mexico. The weekly program is heard in Spanish and English in Mexico, Latin America, the Caribbean, Texas and the western U.S., on a variety of AM frequencies.
And here's a pic of the little sentiment tag. I used some SU! ribbon and a Creative Cafe tag. For the flowers on Flopsey's ears, I used a Fiscars punch and added some A Muse Twinkle Stickers.
Caylee and I got home pretty late last night, so needless to say we were both wrecks this morning. But, somehow we drug ourselves out of our beds, and I think I even got her in matching clothes. She didn't last long tonight, and at this rate I don't think I will make it much longer either.
Me: "What? No way, we are calling them woo-woos forever."
Here’s how it turned out (I think, at least):
Jay-Z - 42
"Hey, D-Money, what's up? Got a question for you."
Spiritually, the benefits of recognizing how to arm yourself when you sense negativity is a beginning step in the intuitive process.
Although, in actual fact, I didn't drink a lot of their beer, and that became a surprising source of frustration.
by Joanna M. Weston
8:14 PM – A Lite-Brite Jacket can only mean one thing. Chris Jericho is here to show everyone what it takes to be the best heel in the business. And, to face Kofi Kingston. This match makes me smile. Kofi and Jericho are both so good in the ring. This is unfair to the majority of the rest of the roster. Who will be able to follow this?
Your almond:water ratio is 1:2 for this recipe.
He loves to read.
Overseas Restaurant
All the sweet things that she can find
An amazingly crafted beer from one of my favorite breweries. This beer pours a cloudy orange color with a thick white head. Coriander fills the nose as to you take in a deep breath in. There is a sweet and smooth taste with hints of coriander and other spices. Even if you’re not a beginner you can enjoy the complex offerings of this beer.
My wife (and her brother) have lost both her parents in under a year. Their grandparents not too long before that. When I met my wife, she had this large loving family. I never had that. Mine was scattered and felt small. It’s hurt to watch her family shrink over the years.
He would jump on his dad to hug him whenever the opportunity arises.
Compile strong stocks from a myriad of industries if you’re poising your portfolio for long-range, maximum yields. Even though the entire market averages good growth, not at all industries are constantly and simultaneously in expansion. Having positions across various sectors can help you capitalize on growth of the booming industries and make your entire portfolio grow. By re-balancing your portfolio, you lessen your losses in smaller sectors while taking positions in them during their next growth cycle.
My family arrived and I kept bouncing while we talked.
I got an MRI for my right knee this evening. I'll get the word from my doctor Friday morning.
— My head is bigger than a golf ball—and much better looking too!
There is nothing magical going on, as the author has opted to instead focus on the creatures and Steampunk technology, which appears aplenty towards the end. Overall, Soulless flowed well, but the middle was a little slow with the romance aspect taking a bit too much time to cement itself. There is plenty of action and witty dialogues along the way to things keep moving a pace. The dialogue and Alexia's own internal thoughts were the best aspect. I thought the properness of it all would grain on me after a time, but the author interjects so much humor that she averts that chasm to the point where I looked forward to having things made more formal again to appreciate the jokes and situations. There is a wide cast of characters many of which I would have liked to learn more about. With 2 more planned books I am sure some will end up better fleshed out. I especially loved the inclusion of the waxed face man and his associated mythology. It is one type of creature I think should get more used in Fantasy books, but is generally overlooked.
I took this image a couple of weeks ago at Byron Bay. I was looking straight down into the Pacific Ocean from a terrific height and the sight of the famous Byron Bay Lighthouse and its various out buildings.
Some studies have even suggested a positive link between diabetes and higher circulating levels of omega-3 fatty acids.
3) What do you feel your ego gains from being attached to it?
Well, day 4 of my vacation was uneventful aside from basic socializing and downloading copious amounts of music. Yes. I do absolutely love my music.
Some potential weaknesses of Spohn’s analysis are the following. In Spohn’s approach, the turbulent convection would have taken place in Io’s interior for over two billion years. In this time, Io’s interior properties would be likely to change due to the heat transferred to the surface and the amount of sulfur and silicate compounds deposited on the surface. It seems doubtful that the interior properties could support this type of convection for such a long time. Secondly, the time scale of the build up of the mantle hot spots, (or magma chambers) from Spohn’s model is only 10,000 years, yet the time frame of the orbital oscillations is on the order of 100 million years. These two phenomena should be related in some realistic way if tidal dissipation is the primary heat source in Io. Spohn also assumed a high temperature value at the beginning of the resonance period in Io’s history (2300 K). This high temperature would stem from radioactive decay in Io’s early history and a proposed period of greater tidal dissipation in the past as Io’s orbit was evolving into resonance. Considering other studies of heat from radioactive decay, from an evolutionary viewpoint, this temperature may be unrealistic. Most other studies of Io’s interior use temperatures of approximately 1500 or 1600 K.
Considering it may be September/October before they get to laying eggs, wouldn't it be a good idea to get a few one-year old hens? A lady was selling young ones on Craigslist. Let's go look.
Later, I ask one of our guides where Kim Il-sung used to live. I am told he used to live in what is now his mausoleum: the very grand Kumsusan Memorial Palace (currently closed for unknown reasons)
Red saree is not only preferred by the brides but also by the friends and relatives of brides. They also want to rock the wedding party with their amazing and stunning look. However, it is very fact that this is the night of bride and she remains the centre of attraction.
It’s hard to explain, Lucy. If you can suspend your disbelief long enough, I could tell you that she’s...charming. And so beautiful, of course. And incredibly indulgent of her favourites.
Either that, or can some brewery with a very high 'cool factor' such as Meantime please redress the balance by making proper, adult-sized beer bottles fashionable again.
How did you fund the show?
So, this post should cover:
Inspired by the children's book "Paddle-to-the-sea" by C. Holling, Adrienne Trent’s newest exhibition, Ground Classification: Without a Trace, sets up a poetic, and at the same time actual representation of a catastrophe. An ancient handmade canoe with large holes in the bottom becomes a survival kit/getaway vessel. The boat is packed with obsolete and some state-of-the-art equipment for survival against the elements (both natural and human created) and is oriented towards the St. Lawrence Seaway awaiting its imminent escape.
Although their comments are ridiculous, in my point of view, it is important to understand the underlying contributing factor(s) of their beliefs. Have our teachers and schools implanted the good moral percepts? emphasis on education and knowledge? How about their families? There are many possibilities but this is a warning signal to our government, teachers, and parents. Our labour force is unlikely to be able to compete with other advanced economy in the future, with the type of people we saw in the programme. Knowledge is power cannot be more true than ever.
Scenario:
Please excuse my goober of a smile in this picture haha
Over the last 8 months, I have been completely amazed at God’s provision. Having a baby (let alone twins) was not in Steph and my plans. When we first found out that Steph was pregnant, we asked all the typical first time parent questions. How are we going to do this, where are we going to get that, when will we fit this in, and how will we do that? Deep down we knew that God would take care of everything, but we still had a tendency to wonder and ask those kinds of questions. We knew that God has a perfect track record in terms of taking care of His children, but still, how is parenting twins going to work for us? Have you ever been there before – wondering how God is going to come through? My guess is that you have and that as you look back on that experience, you are only reminded of God’s faithfulness and His incredible provision.
The courtyard has very deep cellars too and you can look down into them through huge iron grids. Very grim, like some deep medieval dungeon prison.
Smuttynose Winter Ale (New Hampshire), a sweet dark beer with notes of cherry and chocolate. Pair with snapper soup.
I have just recently been arguing on line with some writers who think that the only possible speech tag is ‘said.’
The restaurant itself is unassuming: one of several businesses housed in a long red brick building. Entry is via a white flyscreen door, depositing you into a room that is minimal in decor. Bare tiles, wood panelling and brick walls painted in blue are offset by banquet chairs in violet.
THE LAUNCH SHOW DETAILS
The left eye is mapped to the left side of the body and the right eye to the right side. The top of the eye is mapped to the upper body (e.g., brain, face, neck, chest and heart).
Sunny Jaura said in the Vancouver Sun article, “It’s common sense, save the taxpayer money and do the right thing”. Don’t worry Sunny and Joshua. Public opinion doesn’t have to go thru the proceedings of up to a year for him to clear his name. To all of us, Joshua Evans is a hero that we can determine thru our common sense.
CARMAN WF. Influenza vaccination of health care workers in long-term-care hospitals reduces the mortality of elderly patients. J Infect Dis 1997; 175: 1-6.
Man, it’s hard to get back into The Swing after a few days off. Especially when it’s chilly in the mornings, and you just want to be the cheese in the middle of a Snoozing Children Sandwich. Toasted, of course. I say being responsible stinks.
Now I want to hear some of your resolutions!
I love this novelty chicken fabric.
Horizontally integrated pubs are naturally going to focus on an efficient national procurement policy and offer the same brands throughout the chain. Whether the pubs focus on food or drink is all to do with what drives trade and where the profits and margins lie. The beer choice will always cater for the mainstream and it is futile to moan about the lack of interesting pong. Enjoy a Carlsberg with your panini.
I admired Eve’s willingness to cut a bitch (i.e. Monica): “Micheal is missing. He may be dying. I am not in the mood for your shallow bullshit right now. If you get in my way, I will cut you, because you are nothing but a speed bump on my way to saving him. Are we clear?”
So, why this blog, you ask? Well, as I slowed down to handwrite some letters, I drifted into a very contemplative space. Lately, I’ve been working a lot on personal growth, and trying to figure out who I am after having gone through some pretty major life changes. Writing a letter afforded me that space. Unfortunately, those carefully penned letters went unanswered. Maybe it wasn’t such an unfortunate thing; I’m beginning to see the act of writing was reward enough itself.
Format - ebook
She bucks in here....can you find it?
We just finished the 2nd day of a 3 day workshop and I have a mess of applique to do tonight for our final day. I hate not having a finished project at the end of a workshop so you know I will be up late tonight doing all I can.
I have actually spent most of the day choreographing dances for my classes, maybe all of my creativity and inspiration has been zapped already!!
there can be nothing special
“Kill the f***ing whites now!!! If you afraid of them, let’s do it for you. In return, you can pay us after the job has been done… text us… we are not afraid for the whites like your own people… it’s a disgrace … he asked you and you don’t want to… we will do it, Mandela!”
Well, within the next two days the ABC hit returns and if the trailers and preview clips are anything to go by, it's gonna be a blast to watch as well. I was going to review the From The Beginning special that ABC aired last week to bring new viewers up to speed on Revenge but apart from Emily Van Camp narrating in character, I decided not to instead.
Two years ago, I started running when my boss told me I had no place telling others how to eat better. I knew I had gotten a little heavy and was trying to lose it/tone up. To have someone point it out to me in the way he did literally put me in tears. The next day, I bought a Runner’s World Magazine and NEVER looked back. There is a dirt track by my home that is .67 miles around. Two years ago when I started running, I couldn’t run ONE LAP before I had to walk. In November, during my full marathon, I RAN 13.3 MILES before I needed to slow down. That’s a long way to come in two years.
Haven't heard about Uni yet, but not holding my breath as it is very hard to get in and they get a lot of applicants and very few places to fill.
WANT TO KNOW HOW TO OVERCOME LIMITING BELIEFS…add me on Facebook (there aren’t many Leighton Herdsons so you will find me) and follow me on Twitter @Leighton85 and ask questions.
These things are the flukes that just drive you crazy during the paper chase. Nobody did anything wrong. I can't say a word against anybody...in fact, once everyone was back to work both our adoption agency and home study agency were working all hours of the day and night to get us an approved home study report. I was VERY impressed with the way everyone came together to push us through...and finally my home study report was approved LATE last night. It's going to be notarized today and then overnighted to me, so I should have it off to USCIS (along with a copy of our I800A application petitioning to adopt a child from a foreign country) no later than Friday!
I am completely present
Cause you are my heaven.
I would like to know how a statistical study, no matter how sophisticated, can possibly tell us the subjective motives for acts that were never taken and, moreover, how it can do so with the specificity of telling us approximately how many people did not do what they otherwise would have done under different circumstances. Where are these people? And, more importantly, how would we recognize one if we happened across him or her? (source)
SO PUT THE RESPONSIBILTY ON PEOPLE BEING PISSED AT YOU WHERE IT BELONGS – ON YOU! BECAUSE OF THE SHIT YOU HAVE DONE TO THEM.
We’ve gained quite a following over this past week! A few days ago, we kicked off a new category to cover for you: Movies, and luckily, it’s been greeted with some incredible feedback from the UDuelist community–thanks, by the way! In other news, the official release of the newest Yu-Gi-Oh! pack, Galactic Overlord, is released in a couple of days, so if you missed the preview event, you’ll have your chance at getting some of the most game-defining cards soon! IN any case, let’s get on with our Card of the Night tonight, shall we?
Sexy. I know.
The professor likes shoe sizes, birth dates and the serial number on the refrigerator. These are numbers — and numbers are what he remembers and understands. Yoko Ogawa’s enchanting short novel is about memory, relationships, numbers, and the relations between people and numbers. The Professor loves numbers:
We who long to rest from strife
For Father's day, the Y-O-U can be switched out to D-A-D... both are included in the set.
Ron Paul, you tout “Inflation is theft” yet, never do we hear about you stopping the debasement of our currency by private banks. End the fed, audit the fed, be the fed, fed this, fed that, competitive currency? How do you plan on doing this with private banks destroying it at the governments will? You have lost your mind. And shut up about gold already. Yes, it has been a good investment against the dollar since the crisis, but short of buying shares of Netflix, so has everything else commodity related. That inflation is partially YOUR fault. Shut the fuck up! All of you: Obama drama, Paul, Krugman, Romney, EVERYONE!
If you're the sort of person who doesn't consult Wikipedia, you might know the Twelve Days of Christmas better as an excuse for John Denver to get together with the Muppets.
well now you know that I'm not dead at least. geesh.
If you go travel back in time to any historical era for research purposes, which would you choose?
Red chilli powder - 2 tbsp
I’ll tell my baby girl
of too much inspiration,
For contextual reasons, MacGinnis suggests the list is of captives from Assyrian conquests in the Zagros region, suggesting the mystery language was spoken in that area.
This is the 3-28-12 sketch. These photos were taken 9-22-08. Mike and I had only been together for 1 month, Brian and Susie had been together over a year. They are getting married this June!! We beat them to the punch on that one, as we have now been married for over a year now LOL
5 Nyctalopia 5
be trademarks or registered trademarks of their respective companies.
Nautical theme weddings are a bit different. Seems to me, or at least the bride to be’s I have worked with are very attached to this theme because it is something they share with their groom to be’s.
It’s officially the start of summer holidays here. The sun is shining, the sky is blue. My tomato plants have gone mad with an abundance of shiny red cherry tomatoes. Schools broke up a week ago, the builders took their annual leave as of yesterday. People from upcountry are blocking the roads as they get lost and drive too fast. Restaurant prices have soared for the annual influx of tourists. Oh yes, holiday fever abounds and I swear everyone is wondering around with tinsel hanging out of their ears!
SEE! A papier-mâché tomato chase someone down the sidewalk whilst perched on a skateboard!
“No thats not the thing,
OCCUPY Wall Street protesters have taken to New York’s streets as part of a May Day “general strike” across the US.
Obviously, I'm a fan of the flick. It's early Rodriguez, before he became enamored (or could afford) extensive greenscreen and virtual, CGI special effects. It has real cars, real action, great music, and a terrific cast. I'm looking forward to seeing how it looks on Blu-ray - especially as its preorder (and Best Buy) price is less than $10 bucks.
Night, night everyone!
Dear PEMRA, do you realize how vague and open to exploitation this definition is? What is an ‘impure thought’? Who is this ‘ordinary man’ by whom you will be (quantitatively or qualitatively?) measuring indecency, depravity and corruption? What about the views of an ‘ordinary woman’? Where is the list of ‘public moral’ standards? Do you see how you will be called out here for being sexist, preaching morality, using purposely vague terms to censor content, not to mention leaving yourself vulnerable to threats by right-wing nut jobs who will toss this definition in your face every time they deem something as causing ‘impure thoughts’? Are you ready to tell Mathira her show must be cancelled because she’s too sexy for TV? This needs to be removed entirely, or reworked by someone who is both gender sensitive and a legal expert who can drill down a usable, measurable definition of ‘indecent’ for you.
04-Phantoms-Memphis.mp3
It’s all about the road to damnation being paved with good intentions. He doesn’t lie, he doesn’t need to. Humans choose between good and evil, the Devil doesn’t make them.
7. Do you play video games?
(NOTE: Though US and eventually Cuban casualty figures were later confirmed, there have never been any official and credible figures for Grenadian casualties, either military or civilian.)
Later that day we went to a bounce house place with her soccer team for her end of the year party. She ran and bounced and went down slides for 2 hours. She ran up to me at one point and grabbed my hand to put it on her head.
Please give me your thoughts... do you knit in public?... if you're not a knitter do you find it distracting for someone to be knitting?... should I just knit at home?
To know and see,
Twelve constellations lie along the ecliptic, their symbols used by generations of world civilizations, both as night-time guidance by sextant and, in astrology, to predict character traits and the future.
awaited her.
4. Now to cut your shapes for the tree itself. For this I used Fundamentals 1 cartridge and from the Flowers section I used image 4 together with the circle from the basic shapes on the left hand side tool bar. I cut the following sizes.
Rich, brooding nose with an underlying creaminess and a little touch of exotic and aromatic fruit.
And the anger, the blind compassion that seized and shook you then
I think that's it, but it doesn't visit here very often. Overwhelmed visits quite often, but I think 'support' might be the antedote to overwhelmed. What's more its totally addictive. I can't stop organising support.
Academic historians are establishment ideologues not objective investigators. Starkey had “ Disgraced the academic world”, they claimed? The academic world has been in disgrace for a long time. The treatment of Dr James Watson after his "controversial" remarks stands out as a particularly strong sign of how institutions that are supposed to be about facts and truth have been promoting the orthodox ideology as in Communist countries. Rather than refute any of Watson's claims they attacked him personally, even suggesting he was going senile, and David Starkey's hero David Lammy criticised him ideologically, but not on factual grounds. This Nobel prize winner, co-discover of DNA was being insulted by semi-educated journalists. Now the same thing is happening to Starkey because broke the most important Establishment taboo. The 100 signatures mean nothing; facts to do not change because weak-minded and biased people want them to. The truth is not a democracy where you can collect signatures to decide what really went on. The signatories resort to assumptions:
I love Pablo Honey and The Bends for being pretty fantastic Britpop records. But OK Computer is the death knell and cumulation of the entire scene. It is at turns tuneful and oblique. There isn’t anything as beautiful as “Fake Plastic Trees”, as guitar perfect as “Just”, or as creepy as “Creep”. What it is, though, is strong, melodic compositions using a Beatlesque sensibility to create adventure.
I'm not sure what it is about birds, but I am fascinated by them. My husband has pointed out lately that there are birds decorating every room, I took that as a hint that they might not be his first choice of home decor.
For the price of the kedondong and that of the other products available this week, go to the Weekly Product and Price List, in pdf, below.
Two recent schizophrenic experiences I've had recently. a) going to the darzi, and b) listening to grown men talk explicitly about their sexual experiences.
People in cars? You ever see those signs, big signs on the street that have a bright yellow background and picture of a person walking on them? Those are called "crosswalk signs" and in pretty much every state here in the U.S., they mean that the pedestrians trying to cross the road have the right of way.
Because like I said, you need an amazing amount of apples to make a small amount of cider, so we need all the help we can get! We’ve filled a few bottles for the freezer too. What fun! I doubt our family is immune to the stresses that every other family feels. We too worry about all sorts of things that other people are worrying about in this day and age, we get frusterated with our kids and each other. But there are times when we get to do something like this, that slows us down and makes us appreciate simple things, like cider, solid construction, each others company, and adds a little richness to our every day. And sometimes I think that’s what it’s all about. Adding that bit of beauty and richness into our daily lives, that makes it all worth living for. Cheers!
Prime Minister
Tuesday: Corporate Tax Final (BLECK)
Well it is time again for Tuesday Tweets. I have been a little disappointed in that this meme has not really taken off. There are some really great people who have continued to support the meme and I am very grateful to them however I am contemplating expanding the meme to see if I can get some more participation.
I should be more accurate. They are temporary foreign workers (TFWs) to be precise, not immigrants per se, but as anyone in the immigration field will tell you there is noting more permanent than a temporary foreign worker.
So we walked down the stairs and piled into our 63 Rambler wagon and drove to Pittas on McDonald Avenue. We parked the Rambler in the back of the funeral parlor by the loading dock where they bring in the new customers. My Uncle Manuel made the sign of the cross when he got out of the car, although I never remembered seeing him
As a teen, I was always close to my dad. Mum always remarked, we were the same breed – selfish and arrogant (and ungrateful too, but she never said that).
What ever.
It was a lovely day. Our weather has been wet and cold but this weekend we had fabulously warm weather with a mild breeze that kept us cool along with the champagne!
Carrie Walz
Second half was a long journey so much so that Adi started complaining that she feels like being on the road for the whole day. Next stop was at a place where she played bowling, arcade games, won some 64 tickets and got a ring and tattoo as prize. When I agreed to let her play there she was shell shocked and asked “Mommy, why are you being so nice to me today?”, ”Is it because I helped you to cleanup yesterday?” **rolls eyes** I replied in an ek dum filmy style as “Anything for Adi”.. This is your day. Have fun.
I is important. So make it a priority.
Know that I do
Spree came exactly two years after suspect's father was killed by a black person
When I left work in 2006 and took up writing seriously, I enrolled for a writing course at Coventry University. This was tremendously helpful and I made several good writing friends. I also joined a couple of online writers’ groups and a local writers’ group, all of which have been very supportive.
“I'm just going down south to pick some things up. I'll be back tomorrow. To pick up you and my hat. You be a good boy while I'm gone.” Geoff punched him playfully in the ribs.
Why don’t most people trust themselves and listen to their own counsel?
It is bilingual. I homeschool him in Spanish so we used the Spanish side.
Aiki Combatives or Aikicom as I have dubbed it has elevated the interest of many martial artists, especially from ex- Aikidokas that took another route for the reasons I am expressing here. I don’t claim to be a founder of a new kick ass system, or Soke of this or that. Aikicom is simply my personal expression and interpretation of Aikido as a combat art, how it was originally intended to be. I am still in this journey of exploration and thrilled to have come this far.
9. Supreme Knowledge Domain
The course was through a housing area so the asphalt was great, but the path consisted of about 4 out and backs going up side streets, around a chair and back down. Coming up on the finishing chute I could hear someone on my heels and picked up the pace not to be passed. He picked it up too and we duked it out, but I stayed ahead of him and hit the chute first. I was moving so fast I couldn't slow down before crashing into the person in front of me, LOL. We laughed and thanked each other for the final kick. I didn't think I would win anything since the age groups were 10 year spans and I lost so much time in the second half, but I managed a 3rd place medal and got to walk to the front in my bare feet :-)
“I will be a catamaran, and I will sail away from you.”
139. Discovering a new hobby (photography) to keep me occupied and take my mind off my physical pain.
I couldn’t have said it better myself. Nor could I have more accurately summed up the core message of BreakPoint: The Christian worldview claims to explain and embrace all of reality. It makes hard-and-fast truth claims. And — as another one-time atheist, C. S. Lewis, argued — does not leave us the option of reducing Christ or the Bible to being “good moral teachers.”
Firstly- Evil Midwife from Hell- henceforth EMWFH
Much of my arting is all about the process…not so much the end result. The process is what settles my mind and my spirit. I usually have projects going that are more meditative than anything else.
The thing that I did wrong was that I did not talk to him about what he was doing. I did not confide in him anymore because I felt he would tell people-again. Communication broke down. I became his mother and told him what to do instead of being his wife. When this happened, there was no such thing as kindness. I became sharp. He was a sick man(which happened during our life together), and I lost patience with him after doing everything that I could to help him fix the problem-which was unfixable.
To gleam and wave,
“There is,” I protested.
So now you know about two great apps for your kids. What are your favorite apps?
He also said that India should ratify a number of international treaties, including the Convention Against Torture and the International Convention for the Protection of All Persons from Enforced Disappearance.
Tonight, I was already to go and couldn't.
I searched for answers as I watched him with tear filled eyes. When will it all end. Is there any hope?
Also, I see an amazing potential for Reunion Pr0n* to spool out into The Whole Fucking Cycle of Deployment Woe Pr0n. We know all the little stressors won't be given fair air time - after all, it's not titillating to watch an Army spouse dealing with a bullshit job s/he only scored out of luck even though s/he is qualified for a real career-building position making more money and doling out less bollocks...not when there's hair-pulling and petty jealousy over who's running for the FRG board. Instead, little vignettes of "Awww, poor wifey is dealing with reintegration" will help civilians feel smug and warm-cockle-hearted because it's clear now the six month deployment was the fun part - the part wifey really enjoys. The cycle is so complex, I just don't see how a network show based on voyeurism and Oh No She Didn't moments could possibly convey the intricate and layered reality in 60 minutes with five or seven or whatever different families.
In terms of economic development and business recruiting, the general rule is the lower the property tax rate, the better. For companies with tens of millions of dollars invested in plants and equipment, even a very small difference in tax rates can have a significant financial impact. However, a closer analysis of the data provided by the NCACC shows some interesting points which we, as economic developers in Iredell County, can use to our competitive advantage when discussing tax rates:
What a mood-dampener. (har har)
Still think March is too early to start working with your child? I always advocate starting early and building a foundation at home. Maia and I already work on some of these concepts even though she's only 15 months old - although she doesn't even know we're 'working' yet! But I'm a teacher and I know what to expect for her first year (and those that follow.) I want to share with you too, so that your child can be prepared for an exciting and fun first year of school!
I’m not going to lie and say it didn’t hurt my feelings because it did. Rejection in dating reinforces the fact that no one wants you; nasty comments and bad reviews in writing remind you that you’re not any good at your supposed craft. I’ll not cry (much) about it though. I doubt Dan the troll will ever have anything nice to say no matter how well I write so there’s no need to get myself worked up. To coin an oft overused phrase, “Haters gonna hate.”
The parallels and disparities between videogames and movies are endlessly debated, but there's one certainty: they both return, routinely, to the architecture of New York City. The most frequently filmed city in the world is also the most frequently modeled.
And they are realizing that minimalist living could be what they are looking for.
My parents had apparently underestimated how traumatized I was by my first biking experience. They immediately went into damage-control mode. In a tone of voice that was so enthusiastic it was almost condescending, my dad said "How about I teach you how to ride your new bike, Allie?!" I buried my face in my mom's skirt and cried harder. "Well, do you want to go for a ride on my bike?" My dad continued. "You can sit on the bar while I pedal! It'll be fun!"
Dominic Strauss-Kahn also has a new apartment, and – as we’ve seen already – Murdoch’s New York Post is following every fetish and fart with avid interest. The Post’s latest ‘scoop’ is that DSK hasn’t hired any female cleaners for the flat; this follows hot on the heels of Newscorp’s world exclusive about what a lousy tipper the former IMF head is.
As we face the challenges before us, it is imperative that we trust each other, knowing that no matter how different our opinions or our styles or our decisions are, that we are united in our love and commitment to Jesus Christ. This will not be easy. There have been many reasons that trust has been broken in this presbytery. Feelings have been hurt, deeply. Relationships have been strained and broken. It will take a commitment from every member of the presbytery to take the bold steps of repentance when necessary, going the extra mile, and working through conflict. It will take stepping back and praying together when the going gets tough. And it will mean making room in our busy schedules to build community with each other.
His stomach rumbled. To Rainer's delight, it was rumbling in anticipation of food, not from dread of sickness. Outside in the courtyard a rooster crowed loudly against the faint counterpoint of bells from further down the valley. Rainer sighed and brought the bowl to his lips, chopsticks poised to do his clumsy bidding. He began to eat. The sun tracked up his legs. His chewing sounded loud to his ears. On his fourth swallow with no sign it was coming back up, the addict felt the stirrings of hope. It came to him then, as clear as the cerulean sky he glimpsed, that he need no more than the bowl of rice in his hands. All he need do was eat. Rainer ate in silence, and the way opened up before him, clear and bright.
because all you need is hearing for moans
Is it your job to pull it together?
Everything is made fresh to order on site and is an eclectic mix of American cuisine with some southern and Mexican influences. I should think around 80% of the menu is vegetarian and nearly all the dishes can be adapted to be gluten free or vegan too if required. I know some people think that vegetarian/vegan cuisine lacks interest and flavour, but there is nothing missing from these meals. Just take a look at the menu and you’ll see what I mean! I’ve never come across a restaurant serving food like this anywhere. I could have eaten here for breakfast, lunch and dinner throughout my stay in LA and still not tried everything I’d have liked on the menu.
On Christmas day, after an amazing lunch, I therefore enjoyed a nice Partagas P1 (see my review here) with my brother; I somewhat felt that wasn't enough for such a special day and therefore I doubled-up with a Montecristo Maravilla. While smoking, I got a little bit carried away with the Christmas spirit and therefore I took also a picture of the nativity representation my sister Francesca had prepared in the "lounge" :)
how big that bag is.
I'm sure this will be a popular theme this week at several challenges but here at MY SHERI CRAFTS, we would like you to create a card or project with a Thanksgiving or Thank You theme. Wait 'til you see all the wonderful inspiration the team has for you this week!
But for now, I feel like crying because I’m so scared.
March is hard.. I cannot believe its already March.. then comes April and then May comes to torture me once again. How the hell has it been three years already... May 19th.. Three effing years.. I can't wrap my head around it.. Its a punch in the gut when I hear that your 'friends' are being signed up for the pre-k programs and dance and all of the other fun things you should be doing.. It pisses me off that I still miss you so much, and not a damn thing can be done about it.. Sit in it and wallow.. pretend it doesn't hurt.. Pretend because obviously too much time has passed for me to talk about you openly. Its way too sad.. It pisses me off that you died..that you didn't even have a chance.. You had no chance..why didn't I know..why did I let them poke and prod you so much? It didn't save you, did it? It broke both of our hearts.. Drawing your blood all of the time didn't do much..having the feeding tube didn't do much either.. you still died.. I was told we had 6 weeks and you made it 2... you are still gone and I am still pissed.
l have missed my sewing machine sew much!!!
Honestly, though, to my great shock and surprise, the nausea caused by that 4 liters of vomitous bilious liquid I swallowed yesterday really held me over insofar as hunger goes. I was not even really hungry after the damn thing was over. But, Mom did offer to take me to Top Notch, and I'm never, ever going to turn that down, so I did have a nice cheeseburger afterwards.
Six months later the doctor met me on the street. “Why didn’t you come to see me about those fears you were having?” he asked.
It should be noted that there are a SHIT TON of stores on Rue de Passy, in the 16th arrondissement. Naturally, I didn't do them all. (Pffffff). I just did the ones that I, and most people I know, are likely to frequent:
Purchase Omission Beers and Make a Donation to Celiac Disease Research Efforts at Oregon Health & Science University
“yeah but what if this & what if that”
True, there are a lot of questions and a lot more new ones may evolve over time. But, let’s take a step back. Eight years ago, when 19-year-old Mark Zuckerberg was building “TheFacebook” product, even he wasn’t aware that it would grow to be what it is today and perhaps much bigger in the future. He probably didn’t envision building a social networking site just to benefit mankind but had thoughts of making money off of it, as any youngster venturing out at that age would. It’s an undeniable fact that Facebook, as it is today is the result of investments and hard work from all those in line to gain from its IPO. There have been and are other companies in the same space that have not tasted similar success. Well deserved, indeed. And of course, scores of people like you and me are the reason FB is such a big success today.
The uses for barbecue sauce are endless. How do you use your barbecue sauce?
The whole ordeal was expensive, exhausting, and time-consuming, but it feels good to call a goal accomplished. One of the more involved tasks on my bucket list is now crossed off, and I’m free to dive pretty much anywhere I want. I have plans to dive in Sweden this summer, but I also need to dive in Egypt, Southeast Asia, Madagascar, and the Great Barrier Reef. There’s a whole world to see and now I have access to substantially more of it. Now that’s something to celebrate.
This Week’s Live Music Highlights:
5. Popeye’s Rip’n Chick’n
You gotta laugh when you see the prices charged in pubs. Laugh all the way to Tesco.
This 50% bonus promotion is running until September 30, 2011, and Amtrak Guest Rewards points expire only after you go 36 months without purchasing any Amtrak tickets. That means you can take advantage of the bonus now and hold onto your points until you are ready to purchase a ticket any time over the next 3 years. The only downside of this promotion, if you can count that as one, is that tickets exchanged through points cannot earn points themselves. Nonetheless, the huge savings should more than make up for that small loss.
Said Chacon;
Organizing the Home. . . Designing rooms. . . Home (or room) make-overs. . . How-to. . . Creative decorating ideas. . . Share your latest craft project. . . How to find treasures for the home (department stores, thrift stores, etc.). . Share your latest decorative find or shopping trip.
The Grocery Shopping Kit
He said the submarine acquisition would also contribute significantly towards creating a more balanced capability of the Malaysian Defence Forces.
Favorite places to travel?
The only dies I used on this card were from Spellbinders. I find that many of these images fit perfectly in the oval shapes.
Mr. Eugenides, the Smyrna merchant
You must have hurt someone
So were my tips helpful? Do you think you'll try it or you got a better way?
3. Her red Prada bag
What are the perks you ask? How about free clothing and items for 50% off depending on sales. That is pretty awesome if I don’t say so myself. There are many reasons to host a party and we cannot wait for the parties to begin!
You're very kind and I'm very excited. My days (and nights) have been busy thinking about and planning (with Jesse's help of course) our wedding.
I realize that it has been awhile since I've posted anything =(
This is what you will need:
The most surprising part, though, is this new culture of being available 24/7. Skype IM, email, mobile… where have I been? Everyone else is so comfortable being totally available to anyone, at any hour. I am having a hard time embracing that. But I know I must.
I love pizza but I am also extremely picky about the
Flipse said the combination of the two floral companies makes sense in today’s economy. By merging operations, they will reduce rent, electricity and insurance cost; and can share flower buyers and drivers to pick up imported flowers at Miami International Airport. They’ll also save on office operations such as accounting and human resources, he said.
Told through a series of interconnected eyewitness narratives – text messages, e-mails, blogs, letters, diaries and transcripts – this is an epic story of a world plunged into chaos as the dead battle the living for total domination.
their orange roots wet and coiled, their little buds
and old Flying magazines
The world Thoma has created is fascinating. A group of islands where water is a hot commodity, and suffering from parasitic diseases an everyday challenge. The ruling parasitic race, Gultur is wicked and insane. Though you don’t get a ton of face time with the bad guys there is plenty to suggest that they could care less about spilling blood in the name of their parasite. The descriptions and locales are vivid, and devastating from the fancy Gultur towers to the poor villages filled with people struggling to survive.
'Tis the season for warm, hearty comfort foods and what goes with stew and soup that eats like a meal better than Cornbread?
I have rather neglected Arthur Jeffress of late, but I will return to him soon. It has occurred to me that he has been too easily dismissed in various accounts relating either to Elvira’s trial or his place in London social and cultural life. As with Hugh Wade, he could do with a bit of a reappraisal .Fortunately, someone much better qualified than myself is currently working on that very project.
Some of my kiddos are just zipping along...getting better and better at reading. They just seem to instinctively be able to decode words. But I also have some kiddos who are struggling with decoding.
I'm up early for what looks like another marathon day of nose blowing and figuring out which corner of the sofa I'll be foxholed in all day.
Kazuhiro Anai, 42, Scarsdale, N.Y.
In reading Life Itself, Roger Ebert’s memoir, I admit to feeling a little frustrated at times about the level of information provided while at the same time recognizing Ebert’s intent to be open. I certainly wouldn’t want to read a tell-all, because I think the world is unfortunately losing its sense of privacy, but although his memoir forthrightly confronts some issues like alcoholism in the family and his own physical problems, it seems to skip over certain periods of his life.
As a natural consequence of this abundant time he had for self-exploration, Liam, while beautifully preserving his child-like nature, even at 13 years of age, is perceptive and wise beyond his years. He is thoughtful and has a self-understanding that I wish I had now, let alone when I was 13 years old and getting myself into all kinds of trouble over my lack of self-awareness and the desire to please others and fit in. He is generous and sees this world as a loving, giving place. He naturally fits into that as a loving, giving person himself.
State-controlled media portray China’s leaders as living by the austere Communist values they publicly espouse. But as scions of the political aristocracy carve out lucrative roles in business and embrace the trappings of wealth, their increasingly high profile is raising uncomfortable questions for a party that justifies its monopoly on power by pointing to its origins as a movement of workers and peasants.
As I reflect on the day together, the main reasons this was a truly blessed day, is because I am reminded that in these womyn friendships, there are layers of complexities....richness, and sometimes even challenges...however, when we embrace each other with our truth, genuine love, care and compassion, magic is created with each other...this is what I feel in the presence of these wonderful womyn friends. We share in each other our gifts of self and wisdom, we laugh, create, and commiserate
SO, I put on the scarf, and placed a pin on each end of the scarf where I wanted them to match up. I wanted it to be one flower longer on one side.
I have seen their widespread use at marketing conference, where marketing guys (and gals) like show other marketing guys (and gals) cool marketing stuff. I have seen them on massive banners on the sides of buildings and along the roadsides, yes, basically useless. I have used them myself to point to extended product information, but nothing past that.
Tony and I are sitting in first class seats on USAirways somewhere over the Pacific Ocean! We are heading to Hawaii for 11 nights. Wish it were longer but still happy. Well be splitting our time between Oahu and Maui. Having grown up on Oahu, I always want to go home. This will be my first time to Maui.
When truth goes into vain
Now I know that some advise you to identify witnesses, but in the first few minutes after a shooting you may have other concerns on your mind. Also remember, you might identify a witness who you think saw everything and their statement reads, "I heard a shot, looked up and that guy in the green jacket (you) was shooting the dude that's dead." Wait, he didn't see the knife that was first pulled by the mugger?
This is a test run for new bloggers–give it one month and see if you like it! If you’re ready to jump in (and I hope you are!), go ahead and create a blog, write your first post, and then come over to the Newbie Blogger Initiative H.Q. to sign up. There you can ask questions, talk to other bloggers, or bounce ideas off of new and old bloggers alike (not to mention the nifty banner).
Started early tonight. I don’t know if I’m gonna spit out one story, or go into a litany of different adventures. One of my many brain disorders besides the anxiety, depression, bipolarity, addiction and avoidant personality disorder, is that I always have a million things swirling around my brain at the same time. I used to say I had ADD or ADHD, but it’s not just that I have a short attention span. I don’t jump from topic to topic. They’re all in there together, getting in each other’s way, jumping up to say “Hey,” sometimes even merging together incestuously until I just look like a jumbled-up, crazy mess. That’s what you see from time to time.
The high-tech community contends that allowing laptops, PDAs and other unlicensed devices to operate in the so-called “white spaces” will revolutionize wireless broadband access. Broadcasters counter that such a move would interfere with television signals and distort TV picture quality for millions of Americans. A classic Washington clash of the titans, the fight between the broadcasters and the tech companies has turned savage, with each side accusing the other of distortion and greed.
This blog post is probably my most random attempt at writing, but at least it got written!!
We want to see Chickey Cantor in the game – posted more than one user in the game’s forums. A small but insistent voice was starting to make itself heard. Make her a mascot, a character, another announcer. Have her give super-powerful eggs. People were having a lot of fun with the whole chicken-themed story.
Looking back on this season and looking ahead to 2010 the men's 400 has to be the new frontier - at least in sprinting. After all the 100 is pretty much on lock down with Usain Bolt (9.58), Tyson Gay (9.69) and Asafa Powell (9.72) all scheduled to compete in the new Diamond League - with every meet scheduled to have one or more of this troika competing.
Certainly it´s a charming book , full of fun, interesting and even sad stories, perfect for people that loves music and rock n roll or some historic facts that change our society. She was pretentious or phony(that´s a new word i´ve learned reading the book) flattering herself everytime , i felt her very sincere. At the end of the book there´s a part that´s so sad because it´s like a reflection of her past and how she has missed several friends and people around her and how she miss them a lot .
If time to spare, for goodness sake
If all of that doesn’t convince you to watch BFF then I bet Queenetta (Q for short) could convince you. She is a fast-talking, super sassy 9 1/2 year old (that half matters, just ask Q) who lives in the same building as Lennon, Jess and Joe. Played by Daijia Owens, Q steals focus just about every time she is on screen. With her witty lines and delivery, Daijia is a force to be reckoned with.
I figured something must be up in Vancouver when I saw all the hits to old posts I’ve written about Tamils arriving by ship in Canada, so I checked and sure enough, here we go again.
News Outlets in Utah Decline to Reveal ‘Immigrant’ List
The idea of an Antichrist and Armagedon has always fascinated me. But I never thought about the reality of that actual scenario. The Left Behind books, even though classified as fiction, give me a believable picture of how it will happen and what life will really be like. And if so, I certainly don’t want to be left behind, as I have I stated in a previous blog!
Well, I ruled myself out after his first paragraph because although I could check most of the things he was looking for, because afterall, I am quite the catch and look 40 instead of 53 (Well, that’s what people tell me, seriously…and no, they aren’t blind….), but he was also looking for someone who was fit. Ok, not so fit. I mean, I need to lose some weight. I no longer weigh 108 pounds like I did just 10 years ago…Oh hell, try 15 years…ok, but my nickname was Minnie, as in Skinny Minnie, so I was living in Slenderville for most of my life. But, I now go to Healthplex, and zumba until I want to hit the instructor, but no, not so fit. But, I thought, I’m not looking anyway, remember, Vickie? But, I was sort of intrigued. I didn’t want to join Yahoo to get matched up with him, and I also didn’t want a profile on Yahoo personals..I mean, what the hell would I write? …….”Hi, I’m a 50-something, single, sarcastic, quick-witted retard, looking for someone with a pulse. Please reply.” Not going to happen. But, I was thinking…I should write to this guy…We sound like we have the same interests..I mean, I can hike…I like to write..I like photography…I like to travel…..Here I am, yahoo guy!!! So, I lost my mind and proceeded to think of a way to get in touch with him without joining Yahoo.
prospect base to identify up-sell, cross-sell & new customer opportunities. Ensure maximum
The tracklist is as follows:
So, while he may have had a reasonable excuse, it doesn’t change the fact that he and his family continued to lack what they needed because he couldn’t see anything but his past loss. We have no excuse. We aren’t dealing with some unknown and unknowable foreign personality. God has demonstrated his desire and willingness to be known throughout history. We have His promises in the Bible of His loving care for us, and we have the record of His fulfillment in the Bible also. Any of us who have lived for Him also have our own experience in which we see God’s care if we can look beyond our past disappointments.
Dino TourFossil League: Dino Clash Championship
I'm a fan of The Copper Family, and John Roberts and Tony Barrand helped expose people to their repertoire of traditional songs. I recently found a nice thrift shop copy of Roberts & Barrand's 1971 album Spencer the Rover is Alive and Well, which is available on CD. I think I found this LP at the same time. Roberts or Barrand perform three of the tracks.
The cookies are done now, and crisp with golden brown edges. The pistachio and orange are delicious and light. The peppermint is a little less like a bitter Altoid but still have quite the minty edge to them. It evens out after a few bites, so you don't get overwhelmed, but it is still quite strong.
People don’t realize this, but loneliness is underrated.
Are they articulate?
It’s little reported next to the extinction of species, but as ‘wild’ areas are industrialised, languagees are being wiped out at a frightening rate, say Penn State University researchers.
Getting To the End First
Seasoning: 1tsp oil, ¼ teaspoon mustard seeds, a pinch of hing (asafetida), a few curry leaves, 1 dried red chilli.
4. Size up the situation
“Plain,” Mike chuckled back at him, “I’m pretty sure the kid likes plain cheese, maybe extra cheese.”
The plans were developed as ways to trick the American public and the international community into supporting a war to oust Cuba’s then new leader, communist Fidel Castro.
I’ve decided to switch gears for a change and talk about some of the more interesting stores I’ve been to in Nagoya. I’ve been talking only about Magic stores lately, but there are also people who come to Nagoya for quality anime and other hobby goods. Today I’ll be talking about two stores located in the Osu area:
It pained him that it was fully reciprocated in a way he never could.
Last week, my Tuesday was crazy. I had a meeting with the tourism office about making them a website. I taught a man how to make guacemole and tortillas which he will sell in his store. I played basketball, added a layer to a clay oven and worked on the newsletter I am writing for Peace Corps.
Alex Jones is announcing an exciting escalation in the Infowar. If you have ever wanted to be on the front lines exposing corruption, tyranny and the New World Order, this is your chance!
The 11 year old was adopted four years ago.
Helen Dawes (Mia Wasikowska) is a maid working at the same hotel as Albert. She falls madly in love with Joe Macken (Aaron Johnson), a poor young man who managed to fix the hotel’s heating. Joe dreams of leaving for America and wants to take Helen with him. He makes Helen go out on dates with Albert, who has quite a fancy for Helen, in order to get gifts that they could sell in order to buy tickets for their sea voyage. But as time goes on, we realize that Joe is just using Helen to his own advantage and to make their relationship worse, he gets her pregnant. This nullifies her chances of going with him to America and Albert offers his assistance in taking care of her and her baby, with a possible chance of marriage. The film shifts focus from Albert’s story to Helen’s, and we get the feeling that Albert is trapped by her existence and as a result of her earlier struggles in life, may never be able to start a life of her own.
*Hat Tip: Andrew Wawasmok Moewe Westmoreland
Now, more than ever, with Iran, and others, claiming the HOLOCAUST to be ‘a myth’. It’s imperative to make sure the world never forgets, because there are others who would like to do it again.
I need to get going, but I hope to see you at the show!
I love books. I like the feel and smell of them. I never thought I would enjoy a Kindle but I do. Bound books still appeal to me and I do read them but Kindles are so portable, light and there is only one of them, not a growing accumulation on my shelves. Books are wonderful things to collect but I am in a downsizing state of mind. Traveling with a Kindle is wonderful. I used to travel with multiple books. What if I finished a current book while away from home? Heaven forbid I be without a new book! And what if I didn't like book "A"? Hence the need to pack both "A" and "B". Kindle had lightened my load considerably.
Julia at A Piece of My Mind has been an instance of sweetness and light for me."
The next time I saw Marge was two years later. He was on crutches and looked like he had a stroke. His head had been cracked wide open from the base of the skull and circling across and round down to the ear. He was out of drag and had lost all sense or care of appearance. As he hadn't finally done me any damage I went over to gloat about testing negative and to ask how he was. He told me he had his skull fractured, that another addict who we both knew called Mick had walked up to him in the street and hit him in the head with a mallet. Marge had been in hospital for the past 8 weeks, was clean, though was scoring as he spoke. I kind of REALLY enjoyed knowing someone had done that to him. Had fucked him up for the rest of his days, permanently affected his head, speech, sight and walk. He was a dirty thieving cunt anyway, though it was harsh dues for that. Normally we just let it pass.
It is a worthwhile, much needed resource and one to be welcomed.
i am using 2 of my favorite shuttles, a faux Ivory Silent Tatter from Roseground, and one of the Pop-A-Bobbin shuttles from I'm in the garage.
"It is better to be unfaithful than faithful without wanting to be."
I love the love story! It's so much fun to watch it evolve. Eros is so entertaining, and at times he is pretty hilarious. (His friendship with Hermes is fantastic.) I also appreciated that it's a real love story and not just about lust - they really do love each other, and that fills me with all kinds of sparkles and warm feelings inside.
1. Jim Moray - The Golden Glove
~Tomorrow: Abdominal strength and core training. My brain like to protect me. I can’t really remember whats involved in this workout, and I won’t until i either a: re-read my old posts or b: start the workout. I’ll take option B. No sense in anticipating the actual level of pain.
DUKE’s set which featured a band and two female back up singers was a breath of fresh air with a completely different genre. His soulful voice and catchy choruses were very upbeat and his energetic stage presence kept us entertained throughout. He often encouraged the audience to participate which made for a very enjoyable performance. DUKE has an official website and Twitter – @DukeOfficialUK
While no Malaysian will blame the police for arresting those who damaged police or public property, such as the single incident of half a dozen people badly damaging a police vehicle, there is absolutely no justification for them to threaten and beat up every person they found in yellow, even if they were participating in the rally earlier.
The cracks I’ve mentioned before finally split wide open. Puck plants a seed into Finn’s head about moving to LA and becoming his business partner for Puck’s pool cleaning business. Finn suggests that Rachel consider moving to California after they get married, a proposal which Rachel isn’t accepting of at all. She’s going to New York and she wants Finn to be there to help her through it. Finn then says something completely rational (which threw me off course) to her, asking Rachel whether she’s in love with him, or the guy she wants him to be. I’m pretty sure Rachel has always loved the latter, but nevertheless reveals the undeniable truth that these two shouldn’t get married or even be in a relationship at all.
Authorities, though, don’t consider Merdeka Square an appropriate venue, and have offered to provide nearby stadiums for the protesters. Bersih leaders say the offer came too late.
The Tshwane metro's mayor, Kgosientso Ramokgopa, met opposition party members to discuss the issue on Thursday. The council announced in 2008 that the names of many streets "that were offensive because of their colonial and apartheid associations" had been identified.
I just got another heads-up from Stonetalon. First the basic information itself: Dontrag and Utvoch (of course) were making a scouting sweep around Battlescar Valley, doing a little followup on the skirmishes we’ve had there with Alliance forces, when they ran into another one of the faceless ones we’d found down around Thal’darak Grove. It must have been the runt of the faceless litter, because D&U were able to smack it down pretty easily, but they decided to have an extra look around the area. A rare non-retarded move by those two, I know. It happens.
Thank you for reading! Have a wonderful Thanksgiving with friends and family wherever you are.
For your tummy… Honey’s vitamins, antioxidants, and protein (not so surprisingly) makes it good for consumption, as well. Honey can be used for a replacement for white sugar in summer drinks like iced tea and lemonade. It is also a delicious addition to many meals. Try these easy recipes:
The technical report includes a detailed overview all that’s involved in the process, from which this image (figure 19), to which I added the words ‘Seatte’ and ‘Vashon Island’ for those unfamiliar with where this is. (I passed through the area on my ‘driveabout’ towards Vancouver Island last summer, see here):
Posted by Cristian M.
We do not know what kind of formation their manager would go in for the finals. Will he go with Torres or Drogba or both? But irrespective of his decision, Didier Drogba, even if he comes from the bench could prove to be a huge threat. His physical structure and his finishing have always been feared by defenders world over. He is good in both the air as well as on the ground. He is someone a coach would always want to bring on for he always stands tall when the team needs him the most.
But one thing was peculiar. Even while it slowly grew up to the sunny blue sky, it never forgot its roots. It had the wisdom to keep growing its roots deeper and deeper in the mud.
4) Melt butter and put garlic in the butter and pour over bread.
Love doesn`t need relationship,
Lastly, remember that it is imperative to stay consistent with your messaging and branding across all forms of your advertising; whether traditional or online. Make sure that what you are projecting through traditional advertising is consistent with your messaging on your website and social media channels. Be proactive in monitoring what people are saying about your product and make sure to answer their questions and solve any problems they may have.
Welcomed.
So that was February, folks!! Did I wear you out? Sorry about that....but it HAD to be done!! Next up: MARCH! And I'm taking the same approach. But at least when that's out of the way I'll be able to show you all the fun and cute stuff that has been happening over the past few days and weeks!! (Seriously, the OCD in me will not let me post out of chronological order....)
RHINELANDER, Wis. — School administrators in Rhinelander are considering discipline for high school students who walked out of class to protest layoff notices given to four teachers.
Here is my project and a little info:
A "good" score is around 45 words per minute, although professional typists usually type around 100 WPM!
And then I ran like hell
The Waipahu product scored a knockdown in the first round, survived Miranda’s assault and added the World Boxing Organization flyweight title to his resume while improving to 29-3.
Some one help me!
2. Soliloquy Of Belligerence
Daily I wake up and start my day with fresh juices and my favorite, stinging nettle tea. Several days a week, I end the day with stinging nettle tea. For those that wonder, it tastes great and carries tons of health benefits! Stinging nettles treats inflammmation of the urinary tract, kidney gravel/stones and improves excretion of uric acid. Stinging nettle acts as a diuretic as well! This amazing herb is incredibly useful for myself due to it’s reduction of symptoms like gout and arthritis. I come from a family with a long history of gout and do everything to remain gout free!
Because time as well as money is at a premium, we feel guilty when we promote and let the writing lie fallow. And we feel guilty when we write and don’t promote. Juggling with fire would be easier, and less complicated, especially when the fireballs being juggled include jobs and family.
“No problem,” he smirked. He drew his sword and swung it, cutting the chain. The door flew open.
Thank You to every Woman who has also been called, Mother
"You want a story that no one else is going to do?" said the executive secretary for a local mayor. "WHMP, that's your story. Here, we've always been taught to keep extra batteries in our radio. Why bother, if there's nothing on except garden shows? If someone had given me the key to the station I would have gone there and opened up the phone lines and listened to people and tell them what I knew."
Day Three – Jiayuguan
The first thing we must do is look seriously at the warning. The writer of Hebrews is saying that if this group of people (the people mentioned in 4-6) fall away, it is impossible to renew them to repentance. Their fate is sealed and they cannot be saved again. The writer of Hebrews is not giving a, “saved, then lost, then saved…” theology that is so popular with many Arminians. To put it directly, if a Christian can lose his salvation, then he can never gain it back.
Now that you’re back,
We did however have a hiccup when it came to my gift. Given that she's a mad Harry Potter fan, I bought two flights from Adelaide to Sydney to see the world wide tour of the Harry Potter exhibition. I also reserved accommodation in the heart of Sydney - the Darling Harbour. I thought it was a freakin' brilliant present and told her so about a month early.
But that's a given, right? Especially when your mom takes non-prescribed narcotics and ruins the 6th Christmas in a row.
04-29 San Diego, CA – Porter’s Pub
“Fine,” I fold my arms in thought. “I’ll just make due. Come, you shall assist me.”
I'm at the Vermont Studio Center and asked another writer today how long it took her to find her voice. "Oh, forever," she said. "I'm still finding it." She's working on a short story collection right now and got her MFA at University of Oregon.
For my first Harvie and Hudson purchase, I chose a pink button cuffed shirt and blue French cuffed (the Brits called these Turn Back cuffs) shirt with a contrasting white collar. Both shirts have a spread collar and fierce coloring, typifying the British look. Below you can see these shirts when paired with ties, also from Jermyn Street, to complete the look. The weight of the fabric is exceptional and after one wash, the shirts seem quite sturdy. This is is stark contrast to the dress shirts that I have from stores like H&M that feature thin cotton that have not held up well.
Bake for 25 minutes, or until the center of the scones feels firm to the touch.
Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) Therapeutics under Investigation by Universities/Institutes 11
Also, as you can see she also now has a little sister that we love dearly. One day when she is older, we will share the story of Megan Grace with her.
Emergency responders found Mr Cormier unresponsive at his North Hollywood home last week, according to ABC.
As usual, I’m gonna make a short analysis, trying to figure out how they got nominated. Liza Minnelli was probably the only lock for a nomination that year; she carries her film, Cabaret was a huge success both with the critics and the Academy and she had already won a Golden Globe for her performance; adding to it all: she was already an Oscar darling, being nominated 3 years before plus she was the daughter of their beloved Judy Garland, past nominee. From here on, I’m sure the voting was all over the place.
so that people don't waste their time checking it every once in a while.
"A Wheat Ale brewed with American Wheat and a proprietary blend of Hefe and classic Belgian-style yeasts. A refreshing winter alternative created from the subtle fusion of two classic flavors."
“We have one trillion dollars of self-inflicted disease extra in the healthcare budget because of no exercise, smoking and eating too much,” says Rick Lee from Healthrageous, a company that advises a large number of insurance companies. As one step toward changing this situation, Healthrageous runs an Internet platform where self-trackers can upload their data, and in exchange receive comprehensive health counseling.
Snack today consisted of raisins and Whales. For lunch Maisie had cheese pizza, grapes, jelly and a marshmallow ice cream cone. The additional marshmallow ice cream cones were for K & A.
Quite frequently the moment somebody learns I'm an author they tell me "I have a story" and I always believe them because, frankly, everybody does. Today somebody told me a little story of something that had happened to them as a child. It wasn't horrific or violent or anything. Basically it was a small-minded mean-spirited thing that hurt the child. An extreme case of bullying. It got me thinking, what makes a person so mean and I became fascinated about creating a character based on what little knowledge I have of the person.
Jacqueline Donovan, 34, New York, N.Y.
Becoming too much of a logical mind without using your intuition can be unproductive, but the same is also true with being too intuitive and not logical. Some of the greatest discoveries, inventions and creations of our times have been done by experts who were open to their intuitive side and responded to their hunches in a productive way.
On day one I was in a kilim class working on a pattern called Qashqai---here is a picture of Diana's finished piece. She had made hers into a two sided bag---it was lovely! Not sure yet what mine will be.
“No, don’t do that, I would never do that, even though you are very… attractive.” She wasn’t, but the complement wouldn’t hurt. She rolled her eyes and left her right shoulder bare. I eased myself on the front edge of bed. “I wanted to ask you some questions.”
I haven't been reading your blogs, I am sorry but I have had too much on. I will be back there soon. Promise.xx
MIL bought back 3 packs of 'char kuey teow' (without cockles) and YX suddenly said he wanted to eat. Surprise ! Surprise !
Such data can be immensely powerful even when only gathered for a very narrow range of behaviour. For example, Amazon were able to roll out differential pricing of their products according to past customer behaviour. They were caught when some individuals deleted their browser cookies and discovered that the advertised price would change (no longer having had a reference point to the individual’s previous behaviour).
However, outside the store I struck up an acquaintance with a local woman named Shirley. I showed her some of the printouts I had made from web articles about ul-Fuqra, and she was very interested; she proved to have a wealth of local lore on the subject.
All the trainees were unemployed, says Canada, half of them living in the Fort Greene housing projects (as does Canada). They took courses on the ins and outs of construction safety, including spotting when a crane is leaning dangerously and learning how to prevent tons of dirt from spilling and suffocating workers.
"Look!"
296) my aunt and uncle driving 6 hours to see my mum while she is here
I'd love support...but more than anything I'd love for all of you to tell me how much I CANNOT do this. Because absolutely nothing motivates me as much as proving people wrong.
trying to get the pot out of the center of the image.
Her most recent installation featured her friend, Kim's studio at "Bitty Bits & Pieces". Each photo was better than the last, and by the time I finished reading, I was green with envy! (I want some of those thimble pots!) You'll have to go to the link (her blog name) to read the post to see what I'm talking about. Warning: You'll want some, too!
Men killed by Jonah - 1
18. Tell her she’s beautiful. Say it over and over again. Someday an animated movie or “beauty” magazine will try to convince her otherwise.
Pop stars have replaced religious and national icons for millions of people. The man who undermined the western world Elvis Presley has a religious devotion 32 years after his death and his home Gracelands attracts worshippers on the scale of Lourdes.
I’m way more confident in myself. It’s hard to stay confident before you’re published. You get rejected constantly so you can never be sure if you’re on the right track. All I know is I worked hard before publication to become the best writer I could and I continue to improve and grow. So I definitely see myself as a stronger writer and person thanks to all the things I’ve experienced since my first book.
That the constant fight to gain weight is in direct proportion
So what's my point?
Without further ado, here are some screenshots that will give you a taste of what I’m seeing from Alhazzred. And this is some of the milder stuff, folks. Katinae has been getting similar stuff from him, Aminesta, and others who left with Alhazzred, too. This is all being sent to us without explanation or provocation. It’s simply insane.
Next door is an old short-haired gray who’s spent most of its’ life in an apartment. Can’t decide if it’s just dim-witted, naive, or if the fat around its frame has also clogged the arteries of his brain.
Despite watching that English nanny do it on that TV show, I don’t have it in me by that time of night to keep taking him back to his room. I’m tired and I need some time to do my own work, and the only time I have is after the boys are in bed.
I have a photograph of her, at age, looking at a photo of herself when she was young and beautiful. It hits my heart every time I see it. It is a reminder of what time does to us all and what it did to her, in particular. She was not happy during her last years and I, personally, suffered greatly for it. But I prefer to remember her when she was young and laughing.
I called Shmulik - he and I drive in together, so I wanted to make sure he was awake and would be ready on time. I called Davidi - he came home last night because he's now a counselor for a local youth group - to make sure he was awake and was going to go with us. I'm tired. I want to sleep not coordinate the world.
She would raise the chest whenever she was gifted with something, her eyes glancing at the interior wood of her Hope Chest. The inside of the chest, more then likely not finished, and complimenting that would be the scents that were also stored in this porous chest of hopeful happiness. The smell of the past from the lotion covered hands of your Great Grandma that were embedded into the fibers of the quilt that she hand made for you. These scents, mixed with what you and I may recognize today as carpeting in a hamster's cage, helped add to your dreams of happily ever after.
Naturally, Galileo is now invoked along with a reference to Creationism. Then we are told that "the intolerant Christian mobs that came to rule the late Roman Empire were in turn defeated and driven out of Alexandria by even more fanatical Muslim armies and rulers, who destroyed what little remained of classical civilization that the Christians had not already burned or banished". Again, we seem to be in some alternative universe's history here, since in the real world the naughty old Muslims actually took the Greek and Roman knowledge that had been preserved by wicked Byzantine and Nestorian monks and expanded on it, carrying it to Spain where it was eagerly embraced by Medieval Christian scholars and returned to the west. But that story is no fun at all. Pesky historians and their pesky facts and evidence ruin it for everyone.
Anna: Ah yes, the Kim Kyungho comparison is actually quite fitting for Cherry Filter even though I’ve always related them more to Jaurim myself. They should be able to offer a lot more variety than any of the artists currently on the show. And for Mot, I absolutely love them and their covers and would be very, very happy to see them on the show, but they do the very best when sticking to their core sound. Still, it’d be very interesting to see how they’d bre received by the audience.
The alternating current surged into him.
Take the journey with her, if you dare.
Tickets are booked. We leave in 10 days. As we prepare to be gone for a few weeks, reality is setting in. Two little ones will soon be home! Looking back over the last few months, I am so thankful for all of you. You are a special group of people who have lifted up our family one way or another. We are very appreciative.
King of Judah called it “good religion” to the god of Moab, Molech, who, by the
Smoked near a half pack of tobacco waiting for that brother of mine to show.
You than realise that the wall is no wall and the breaking has been done by the most unexpected. The meaning drift away in a woorden boek a word-book (dictionary), come and drift with me.
Hello and welcome to The Oaken Bookcase!
Despite the dark nature of the plot, this young adult book is a jolly good read. The interactions and dialogue of the three girls is light and entertaining. Their spirited support of each other helps them through the good, the bad, and the scary. However, the girls’ interactions with the police, both the good cops and the bad cops don’t ring true. Still it is a good debut novel, suitable for tweens who like murder mysteries.
Since we went to Cornwall here Jay has really not been back to his 100% self since. He was forever running a fever, being ‘floppy’ or just generally a bit upset.
Zinn B. Supporting the employed breastfeeding mother. Journal of Midwifery and Women’s Health 2000; 45: 216-226.
Emergence lays out the blueprints for birthing this new kind of human, explaining all the steps in what Hubbard calls “an intimate and practical process for all who wish to make the transition to the next stage of evolution.”
He might as well do it for me.
The first event I went to was the Balloon Glimmer on April 26th. The Glimmer showcases some of the balloons that are going to participate in the bigger Balloon Glow and the Balloon Race. Unfortunately, the evening was too windy for the balloons to inflate for the Glimmer. Even without the Glimmer taking place, walking around the Kroger Fest-a-Ville area was a fun evening. There were numerous options for carnival food, including red velvet funnel cake with cream cheese icing. There was also plenty of people watching to do especially around the small concert going on.
Maybe our loved ones, the ones who have already passed, are gathered around our little fledglings, urging them on with ghostly coos and besotted smiles.
"Ahhh. How are you? Everything okay?"
I repeat, archaeology is one of the most important fields for the understanding of ourselves, and better yet, the betterment of ourselves, so that we may have better and brighter futures.
Despite the smaller than expected size, you get plenty of them to munch on and it is all about taste anyway. No one stopped eating Angel Delight because it looked like diarrhoea . Though I stopped eating these because of the distinct lack of Wispa taste. These taste just like the Twirl Bites and Giant Buttons, the only difference is the shape! A real Wispa bar has the hard shiny surface and the bubbly airy centre, these Bitsa Wispa are too condensed to offer the magnificence of the real deal. There is a slight airy sensation, but these are not the Bitsa Wispa we’re looking for.
I have it as the wallpaper on my laptop
Statesville and Mooresville are combined into a single Micropolitan area for statistical purposes by Site Selection magazine (Micropolitans are cities with populations between 10,000 and 50,000). Iredell County is unique in that it has two economic development organizations working to grow private investment and jobs for one of the fastest growing counties in North Carolina.
Hi, sweet boy. You are almost two years old.
See some of the pictures below
So there you have it, the mirror fetish of Umberto Lenzi, finally revealed and exposed … now it’s up to you to find the cracks that reflect his mind in the mirrors of his movies. I promise you that you will look and reflect upon Lenzi’s movies in a whole new way from now on.
Julie: "Anyway, the cake is great. Are you serious that you want to give the rest of it away? I'll take it."
2. Root for the Philippine Azkals in a live game - Pending, but fingers crossed I’d catch their next local game. However, I must admit I’m not as enthusiastic as before. The bad rep the boys is receiving makes me feel a bit iffy.
After a few minutes of cooking the meat, onions, and garlic with the seasoning, pour in 12-16 ounces of beer. I like to go on the 16 end of the spectrum especially if there is more meat, but it means you will have to drink the rest of the beer. Cry me a friggin’ river.
Levi has been a trooper. This 5th series has been one of the worst. He's been extra fussy & needy. Yesterday he cried about anything & everything. He has been sleeping less & waking up seeming uncomfortable... which also adds to the fussiness from being overly tired. He's had a lot more noticeable mood swings. He goes from being too excitable to being completely drained (which maybe from the Tylenol & IB Pro). His fever has continued to spike higher than it did during the 3rd & 4th series of fevers. So just a lot more noticeable toll on his body this time around. Anyways - Today has already been a bit better. Still has the fever, but less whiney. He got a lot better sleep last night too... So that's what I know right now. We'll see what the Doc has to say tomorrow morning. I'll keep you posted...
My card is a 4.25" x 5.5". Blue card base is from Recollections. The pattern paper is from a paper pack I bought a while ago (sorry can't remember who makes it). I thought it was pretty and went with the coloring since it has pink, green and yellow. Ribbon is from Michaels. The scallop circle was cut from Elegent Edges and I cut it in half and tucked it behind the ribbon and stamped Spring from one of my stamps. The flower was made from the Cuttlebug Quilling flower dies. It's the daisy one. I had fun making it and it was easy to do.
I'm so excited that Bout of Books has started!
"Yes, exactly. Not just rice, either, or vegetables. Rice pilaf."
will be attending with dinners, luncheons and tours thrown in to give us the 'big picture'.
Nevertheless Cardinal Cooke’s call for volunteers to go out on the streets to fight pornography was met with an enthusiastic response. Led by Father Duffel of Sacred Heart Church and Father Rappelyea of Holy Cross with the strong backing of the McManus Democratic Club, groups of residents, largely the remnants of the old Irish community with a few younger professionals from the newer buildings, would go out every night to demonstrate against pornography on the streets, and at times confront the pimps and prostitutes and their customers. In a sense, not since the days of the Irish street gangs like the Gophers had their been such a fight for control of the streets of Hell’s Kitchen and certainly this one had much higher stakes—with the Catholic Church and groups like the McManus Club on one side and the pimps, prostitutes, pornographers along with the Colombo crime family on the other.
Consisting so far of 10 Northeastern and mid-Atlantic states — Connecticut, Delaware, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Rhode Island, and Vermont — the scheme is described on the RGGI website as “the first mandatory, market-based effort in the United States to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.” Its board of directors consists primarily of each participating state’s top environmental bureaucrats.
In another article, Dr Marius Barnard (the brother of Dr Chris Barnard and who assisted him in the pioneering human heart transplant), said the film which suggests that Hamilton Naki did not receive recognition due to political reasons, is a blatant distortion of the facts. He says it makes a farce of the medical breakthrough achieved by Chris Barnard.
Apple Inc.
Come See Annie Selke at
It’s a little cheesy in places and there were some parts that I sort of found a little unbelievable but this is not real life – it is a novel – and I found it very entertaining. I did feel a little cheated by the ending. This whole novel revolves around Jo and how she’s not quite all she seems. She goes to the retreat as a way to get close to Ned but whilst she’s there we see that she has some real issues of her own that she needs to deal with. I felt like that part of the story was glossed over a little. I know it’s not a deep and meaningful book but it seemed like we had the big reveal and then it wasn’t really addressed in a way I was satisfied with.
Obviously, the other major category this month was veterinary bills. To prepare for summer fleas, we restocked on Comfortis, purchased directly from my vet. I have found that my vet’s price on this is more competitive than the online pharmacies because they give one free dose with every six-pack purchased, and they frequently offer mail-in rebates ($10 off this time) that are only available for prescriptions purchased directly from veterinarians. Through my vet, it ends up being about $11.22 a dose for each 20 ~ 40 pound dog (compared to $15 / dose at Pet Meds or Drs. Foster and Smith).
While I'm excited to see that yes, people do love what I do, it devastates me to know that there is another mum without her beloved babe, another mum (or dad) experiencing the most devastating grief imagineable.
President Sarkozy has vowed to become a monk if he is voted out of office in May. I hope this is a subtle way of confirming that Carla Bruni will remain the first lady of France if he loses the election. A woman of her regal beauty clearly belongs in the Élysée Palace as much as the Louis XVI four-poster bed, whose sheets she could earnestly keep warm for the next incumbent.
Immortal Dian!
Mr Cameron wrote: "The last 24 hours must have been extraordinarily difficult and painful for you.
The kiddies had to choose their favourite of the three and then they had to use the shapes template to create their Angry Bird. I only provided the basic shapes and the kiddies had to draw the extra ones they needed (for example, I only supplied them with one rectangle for an eyebrow and they had to draw the other one. Doing this helped satisify more of the maths outcomes than if I had just given them all the pieces needed....).
ADELBERT'S Tripel B Tripel Ale
Hi and welcome, Shelley. The first time I heard you read from Jubilee, I knew I was hearing something special. What made you decide to write this particular book?
Bombed so much, the locals needed to find ways to deal with the damage. One product of the bombs was an enormous amount of broken crockery. With little else to do with it, they dumped it, often on the fields or the allotments. I still turn up a considerable amount of blue and white pottery, and one of my allotment neighbours is collecting it for a mosaic.
Clearly, liberty has been devalued to the point of actually, unbelievably pursuing litigation to eradicate it.
My beloved company, FilWeb Asia Inc. is about to launch its first ever summer beauty pageant called Mr. and Ms. FilWeb Stunner 2012 on April 21, 2012 at Club Balai Isabel, Batangas. And surprisingly, our department, the Writing Department (the most “eccentric” department in the planet according to others) decided to volunteer one of its writers (my good friend and workmate) Dhang to join.
Larger lamp for dresser
While this is baking you can prepare your salad ingredients and cook your tempeh. I used a generous amount of romaine and green leaf lettuce, as well as some raw brocolli, shaved carrots, sliced radishes, chopped celery, and topped off with some alfalfa sprouts! But any veggies you have will work!
1/2 C. fresh lemon juice (5-6 large lemons)
the light of my white
YA THINK, EINSTEIN????
441300 Automotive parts, accessories, & tire stores
Clever… for sure it is. But… what actually happens is that one is continually being bombarded with advertisements that, because of their intrusive nature, are now having very little effect.
Friday--I slept till 10, got up and it was just beginning to snow (again!) I decided not to go out looking for Lazertran waterslide decals that Flea Market Trixie tempted me with. Another time!
My own emotional reaction. Not of the people, what they think of me. There is nothing else to fear, but my own emotional reaction.
Iván Meade - What are gardens for?
From random tear-gas attacks on innocent children to sporadic electricity and water cuts in refugee camps, Palestine is a nation screaming to be saved from Israel’s oppression. The 8ft tall concrete wall that has been thrown up around the West Bank and Gaza to prevent those without a permit from leaving, stands as a physical reminder that Israel’s paranoia of the spread of Islamic fundamentalism has gone too far.
But, of course, our baptism is our ordination. For all of us. Or perhaps we might say that our Confirmation is our ordination.
Well, that is all of my Winter and Valentine's Day decor. All of this will stay up now until the end of February. I do keep up all the Valentine decorations because Feb. is Heart month and I do not decorate for St. Patrick's Day as there is not much time between Valentine's Day, St. Patrick's Day and Easter....
17) Clinique
Then Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to the camp at Gilgal.
Parents-a-giggling as they stayed up much too late helping santa.
Perhaps when everyone knows that gods come down to Earth, we hallucinate gods; when all of us are familiar with demons, it’s incubi and succubi; when fairies are widely accepted, we see fairies; in an age of spiritualism, we encounter spirits; and when the old myths fade and we begin thinking that extraterrestrial beings are plausible, then that’s where our hypnogogic imagery tends.
PICKLED BEETS WITH CURRIED HONEY
that made you say “I HAVE to write this!” Was it a certain scene,
Patrick Patterson – (Peak) Team (Signature Shoe) – size 15
So. I guess with a title like that you can tell the outcome of this story.
And that’s another thing the Iberoamerican selection in both festivals have in common: about 90% of them will never be screened again in this country after their brief festival runs. Fortunately, both festivals have year-round programs that give these films another chance to find an audience: the Chicago Latino Film Festivals’ Film in the Park and Reel Club series and the Chicago International Film Festival’s International Screenings Program.
A short but steep climb takes me into Amberley village. I would like to take a look at Amberley Castle, dating from the 12th Century, but it’s a luxury hotel now and I suspect they won’t welcome me with half of Amberley Swamp clinging to my boots and trousers. More welcoming though is the Village Store, after a visit to which I’m happily munching on a locally made pastie, while making my way past gorgeous thatched cottages, looking so cosy and warm; meanwhile the rain tries its best to drown me.
Seems like we're getting behind on blogging. And for our what, 5 people that actually read this and check it regularly, we're sorry. It's been quite the adjustment getting used to my new schedule, which in turn has made Eric and Alli's schedule quite different too. We're also busy with trying to prepare for Christmas, mainly, the drive back to Ohio. I know we mentioned before that this is the first time we'll be driving back home for Christmas, and we're definitely excited. My mom has promised me the best gift ever... her waking up with Alli each morning and letting me sleep in. She's even going to let us use her brand new bedroom furniture, in her room upstairs, and sleep in the guest room while Alli sleeps in my old room, so we really won't hear her and can just get some rest. I think that's better than any Christmas present I could ask for, I am really looking forward to it. On the flip side, we have really slacked on decorating around here. I guess it's because we know we're leaving a week from tomorrow, and we'll be in Ohio for a week, so there was really no point in getting our house all decked out here when we won't be here to enjoy it. So, we have a tree, with lights, but no ornaments. It's the thought that counts, right? Alli and I were hanging out with our cul-de-sac friends this afternoon and their mom even mentioned to me, "What, Eric's not putting up all the lights this year??" We are usually the only house in the neighborhood to put up a bunch of lights... not this year. I feel like a bad Buddy Elf, I really do love Christmas. Next year, we're going all out again, I'll make sure of it.
I was fortunate to have visited two very beautiful cities here, Nuwara Eliya and Kandy with my wife and the trip meant we ended 2011 on a high. It is incredible that you can experience cold and warm climates just hours apart and this country has so many beautiful cultures and places to see. More than the wonderful sceneries, what got my attention was how different the people there were, from the people living in or near Colombo. Everyone seems ready to offer you some sort of help or curious to know what you are expecting of them. They are laid back and hardworking at the same time. Time seemed to slow for us when we were there. Even the supposedly dodgy train ride was an experience of a lifetime. I would go there over and over if I do get the chance. This is the kind of love hate relationship I am talking about.
I will admit that I have let up this year on the usual "cavalcade of junk" that makes my family room look like Santa's sleigh threw up....it's a smaller pile this year. As the boys get older the gifts seem to get smaller and more expensive and we have decidedly cinched the belts as well. Yo, we have a pool to pay off, right? Merry Christmas boys.
Tugendhat J granted the non-disclosure injunction substantially in the terms sought, except that he refused to prohibit disclosure of the bare facts that (i) SKA and PLM were in a relationship and that (ii) SKA is the father of PLM's shortly-expected twins. For the sake of clarity he stated that he was not ordering that any disclosure be made, nor was he authorising anyone to make that disclosure: he was just declining to prohibit it by an injunction. Regarding the twins, he added that, without having heard any evidence of submissions about the rights and interests of SKA's first family, or of the twins, he could not be satisfied that the claimants were likely to succeed in establishing that publication of the information in question to SKA's first family should not be allowed. This being so, an injunction was neither necessary nor proportionate.
Well, writing to me is passion, the passion to mark my words with something I feel deeply attached with. It is the passion that helps me in incorporating my thoughts in some identifiable shape which are otherwise always messed up. Writing is the passion which helps me deal with the situations in daily life. Writing- the passion to achieve the highest limit I can think of achieving to come out as a better person, a better interpreter. Writing is the passion for me to strive, struggle to reach that limit and then, set an even higher limit to achieve.
Peter Alexander Bielfeld, 44, New York, N.Y.
The state-run channel says it aims to bring viewers “another story”, one not told by the so-called mainstream media. In practice, this means bringing viewers the Russian state’s point of view. Let’s not forget how several years ago, Vladimir Putin, who is due to be inaugurated next week for a third presidential term, once “jokingly” praised former Israeli president Moshe Katsav for being a “strong man” because he “raped 10 women” (Katsav is now serving seven years in prison after being convicted of two counts of rape). “I never would have expected it of him,” Putin was reportedly caught saying off-mic during a meeting with then Israeli prime minister Ehud Olmert when the allegations first came to light in 2006. “He has surprised us all,” Putin said. “We envy him!”
f/ Foreigners entering Vietnam to deal with urgent circumstances, such as complicated technical and technological incidents and problems that affect or threaten to affect production and business but fall beyond the handling capacity of Vietnamese specialists and foreign specialists who are currently present in Vietnam.
This morning was run #2 of the week, in which I ran a 5k without walking one time.
I always over cook the pasta. I happen to love over cooked brown rice pasta. But I reccomend you cook the pasta to your taste, strain and put it aside. In olive oil, saute the chopped fresh chives, and garlic. Add a sprinkling (or more) of sage, sliced mushrooms, and the smoked salmon, stirring over medium heat. Add white wine - I suggest starting small and adding more. Too much is too much, so go easy. As the white whine bubbles down, add the cooked pasta and fresh dill then stir until everything is coated.
There's a skyscraper with a whole hidden floor...? someone thinks, momentarily amazed – before driving into the car in front of her.
with him even a little, that small
I find it ironic that there are a number of Sir Ray Tindle scholarships and bursaries available for students to study journalism at the University of Buckingham whilst staffing levels and conditions have been drastically reduced for working journalists locally.
This theory has been applied to all areas of science since Lorenz’s 1960 experiment.
Have a great day, enjoy your crafting and above all stay safe and healthy.
Confession 4:
Mr. T was fooling with my phone. You have no idea the flood of anger, resentment, and betrayal that surged up in that instant. What? Did he not trust me? Did he think I was talking to other guys? And what if I was? It is not like we are married or anything. If I had guy friends (which at the moment I don’t) then that’s my business. Was he checking my text messages or calls or something?!
And snakes there were, are, will be--till yawns
The ‘Bad Boys’ actor submitted the documents in Los Angeles County Superior Court just one day after they announced their separation last week (24.04.12).
I try to make sure to have at least a couple cans of shaving cream on hand. There is something innately soothing about rubbing your hands in a fluffy mountain of shaving cream. When you rub it on the tops of your hands, it almost feels like a massage. No wonder so many children rub it on their arms, faces, hair, and bellies (oh, yes...I said bellies)!
In recent weeks, we've been discussing materialism in our family (well, maybe it's just me). Personally, I've been struggling quite a bit lately with the desire for material goods. I fully understand and embrace the fact that I am blessed with a comfortable life: home, car, job, physical comforts, relatively healthy family. We are better off than 90% (or higher) of the planet. But it's when I compare myself to the other 10% that I start to feel down. Why can't we have a house with a yard? Why can't we just pop out and buy a new car? Why can't we go on a nice vacation?
to allow for it to fold properly.
very confused.
Instead, you will have to seek out alternative sources, such as this great backgrounder from the Australian Socialist Alternative news website, which makes the point that the $US 100 million pledged by Obama to help Haitians is less than 0.1 per cent of the 2010 budget to continue the occupation of Iraq and Afghanistan. This highlights the real priorities of American imperialism.
5. Handling barriers and roadblocks: RB – “My interest in life comes from setting myself huge, apparently unachievable, challenges and trying to rise above them”
I will now commence with using bullets to give you some random updates from my life recently, some noteable notes, if you will:
Believe nothing merely because you have been told it. Do not believe what your teacher tells you merely out of respect for the teacher. But whatsoever, after due examination and analysis, you find to be kind, conducive to the good, the benefit, the welfare of all beings — that doctrine believe and cling to, and take it as your guide.
1. post-it notes — who doesn’t love these precious little gems for note-jotting? i like to use them as bookmarks, to leave little words of inspiration around my studio, to stick a sweet message somewhere for the hus-band, and of course the obvious, to take notes. if i put myself on a strict blogging regime, i’m counting on these babies to keep me organized on my blogging calendar, color-coded and all!
I think i hate people and what they have done.
Epic is a BIG word!
One last entry for the Papazian Cup, it's brothers, Jason and Todd Alström, founders of BeerAdvocate, on altbier:
#8 - King of the Bums
Let us not forget that Suarez has NOT been found guilty of a criminal offence in a court of law. He has been charged and found guilty by a sporting body overseeing a sport. The burden of proof is completely different.
"Big Jim is an arse!", he shrieked. "Chick Young is a baldy wee twat! He talks pish!"
It was super fun. I would do it again.
I started Scrapbooking when I was pregnant with the twins in 2003 . And truly I love everything about this craft, preserving our family’s memories, the creative outlet for me, meeting fabulous like minded people and in the past year or so I’ve discovered the online world of scrapping , blog challenges, forums etc. I think just about every day will find me doing something scrap related, if it’s not actually scrapping then it’s being online, taking or editing photo’s or all of the above. J
You’ve been up all night, and the night before
CLARKSVILLE — Before he addressed One Southern Indiana members on the topic, Clarksville Town Council President John Gilkey conceded his take on tolls for the Ohio River Bridges Project would likely keep him from being “the most popular person in the room.”
At the core of the operation is Collective Intelligence, a proprietary system that provides real-time protection by harnessing Panda’s community of users to automatically detect, analyze, classify and disinfect more than 63,000 new malware samples daily.
My attention was drawn to this by Melbourne Lord Mayor Robert Doyle. Doyle took listener’s calls today on Jon Faine’s ABC704 program.
Actually, the closer you look at Spire Publishing, the more and more they seem to offer as an author solutions service. They provide four distinct packages, the Professional, Essential, Print Ready, Poetry, as well as a bespoke service where authors can utilise each individual service.
The district pulled tens of thousands of pages of badge reports, e-mails and test security documentation. Data were sliced and diced (though not all of the data because the state refused to provide the district with additional requested data). Hundreds of employees were interviewed. While I understand the shortcomings of the KPMG investigation, I was personally present in a number of these interviews and in some instances, asked their questions myself. Yes, KPMG could have been more familiar with the school district context, but many of the questions were tough and direct. The interviewees felt the weight; they felt uncomfortable.
Although Blackbarony, Stanhope and Dawyck were rebuked for their failure to respond to the field preachings, most of the committee’s ire was directed against the earl of Tweeddale and lord Torphichen, for not informing them about the conventicles which had taken place between their estates.
IANS/EFE/Tajikistan News, 02/25/2012
My soul is among lions;
Quatro: I'm addicted to those shows where they talk about and/or investigate hauntings, but I hate most horror movies.
After Younus’s tragic suicide emerged earlier this month, Khar continued to deny having any part in the attack – claiming in a television interview a different man with the same name had carried out the crime.
One of my great whitely heroes is Daniel Defoe, who used various names for his books. His novels weren't actually published as novels at all; they were supposedly the autobiographies of Moll Flanders, Colonel Jack and other rakish adventurers. I envy the way that he could conceal his own identity so completely behind the voice of his narrator, hiding himself as entirely as the modern ghost-writers who give voice to pop stars and footballers, letting readers imagine that they're reading an honest autobiography.
Some of my favourite things are Granny Smith apples, the scent of lilies of the valley, the sound of quiet, and sandwiches of cheddar cheese and peanut butter.
2.Pass it to 15 bloggers and invite them to collect this award from your space and dont leave it in general.
The Forward also wrote that the baby’s death was not “attributed to their ritual circumcisers’ use” of MBP, as if that attribution was made in a vacuum. But it wasn’t. The death was “attributed” to MBP by the medical examiner who did an autopsy on the baby and who had complete access to the baby’s medical records. Further, that cause of death is backed by the state’s Department of Health and the city’s Department of Health.
Of course it slipped into my bag perfectly and I reviewed everything I had done while flying home on the plane.
In this pic we rode an elevator to the top of an open silo. We could have climbed the stairs to the top! This is overlooking the harvest gardens. Looks like a quilt doesn't it! That is what they are trying to duplicate.
But a larger problem looms. The Darkness, a sinister creature that has lived buried deep in the hills, begins calling to some of the teens in the FAYZ. Calling to them, guiding them, manipulating them.
– Any Colour You Like, live from Brighton June 1972 (previously unreleased)
Some tutorials I do simply to share techniques that work for me. Others, I write in order to force myself to expand my own knowledge. The latter is the case with an "Alpha Mask" tutorial that I hope to write. I'm more of a layer mask guy, so this whole "alpha" thing is not something I normally do. I decided to read up on alpha masks and then got distracted (as I am wont to do). Actually, distracted is not quite right. Burnt out from technical details is probably more like it.
The Isleys jumped right into a high energy medley of Love The One Your With and Listen to The Music. If this was a cover contest, Nazareth picked the wrong Holiday Inn to start talkin’ trash. Ronnie then took hold of Todd’s Hello It’s Me and wrapped it all around his soul. The opening word - Hello - Ronnie kept repeating it like he had been hypnotized. Thirty-seven times he said the word, and each time he caressed it a little differently, adding an inflection that kept this one word mantra fresh, made it seem like a totally different song than what Rundgren had written.
I will pick a winner every week for a critique of your first five pages. At the end of April I will pick a winner for the grand prize. A free critique from me on the first 15 pages of your novel. Good luck!
Joy started gymnastics!! Finally she is enrolled in a class! I have wanted this for her since she turned 3, which happened about the time Rob got a 10% pay cut at his old job. It is one of those things that I wanted for her. I want her to explore different options in life, like gymnastics and dance, maybe even a sport or two. Extracurricular classes are one of those things that I wanted as a child, and something I want for my child.
shoot up like bottle rockets
However i did like how historically accurate it was. It had the story of Lancelot and Guinevere and the ‘love’ story if you can call it that. For me it stayed pretty close to the original story. Some parts of the language were funny, but i think if i was younger i would have enjoyed it a lot more.
I debated about posting these because I suppose picture posts are not overly interesting, but a friend of mine often sends me instagrams of where he lives and I love it. I love seeing different parts of the world and country! I hope you enjoy it as well.
Jamie Moyer is older than Greg Maddux … Jose Canseco … David Justice … Will Clark … Benito Santiago (!) … Dwight Gooden … Greg Swindell … and and the late Jose Lima.
This shot was a little more candid than the others.
Existence has its roots in non-intelligent bliss of the macrocosm
There’s no doubt this election is unlike any other election we’ve seen in more than a decade. The sudden exposure to real democracy may have some people confused. They are used to just voting by rote and ritual and a new way of thinking is almost too big and scary to comprehend. So, they are trying to tell the rest of us with open minds that we are doing something terribly fiendish by coming up with a creative solution.
I feel confident in classifying it as "Extreme" because the traditional mullet, as everyone knows, is "business in the front, party in the back," while S.'s was decidedly a party at every angle.
Also inside…
But then came the brilliant idea. Ryan and I agreed to call each other at 6:30am to talk about going to breakfast. Sure enough, we were up and about before seven and grabbed some infamous Maple Cafeteria vegan goodness.
I have a new home. A new address. A new zip code. I no longer refer to my parent's house as "home." In this house, I most recently have a new kitchen. Through my husband's and (some of) my own blood, sweat, and tears, we have remodeled our kitchen. It is now my favorite room of the house. Thanks honey! I read different blogs, and they always pay homage to their husbands and their tools. Well, the kitchen would not have been completed without him. (I will post with pictures soon.)
She left their four children with him, as is often the case. (“He treats them very well. So why should I worry myself about them?”) She has seen them once since, in 2005. She left, certain he’d miss her and her cooking, especially his favorite dish, spaghetti bolognese, made from a recipe she’d found in a magazine.
Tonight I’m going to watch a movie on Netflix that arrived in the mail yesterday. And Monday, you are not going to believe this, but I’m taking another short trip. I seem to be doing this a lot lately but I guess I’m making up for not being able to do much of anything last fall.
After some long work hours recently (finishing off a month-long project), I was given a couple extra days off. So I took Friday and Monday and made a 4-day weekend sandwich........yum.
In an interesting report carried in the Economic Times, it has been reported that the Commissioner of Customs has not only allowed the parallel imports of Dell computers into the country but also ordered Dell to pay demurrage & warehousing charges to the importers whose goods had been seized for over two months due to a complaint made by Dell.
Now I've attempted the work and I have to say that there is the phantom of my third reason lingering in my head. The prose is hopped up, perfervid, and overdosed. There are entire passage in which it is nearly impossible to make out what Kerouac is trying to convey--and I get the suspicion if I could make it out, I probably wouldn't care for it any more than I do the surrounding prose I comprehend.
Insurance and Litigated Claims
During the break all the teachers told me how much they liked the lemon bars. A success towards my goal - introducing new foods to the country, one dessert at a time! It is really fun to have them talk to me now and include me in their conversations (which sometimes means that one of them will have to translate). Nadia has mentioned everyday how much fun she had taking me to dummbalah!
I even had no Christmas mood at Christmas eve. (oO) I hope for next years Christmas.
Note that Pigliucci calls Krauss a "moron," a term that Krauss himself applied to philosophers like David Albert, who unfavorably reviewed Krauss's book in the New York Times (Albert, however, is also a physicist!).
PR Finish time: 4:44 for my 4th marathon on December 4th... and 4 weeks until my next marathon.
Did about 6 or 7 unbroken Double Unders. Watching the feet is key. When I don’t look at my feet, I’m not synching the rope with my jump. Looking at my feet and seeing how high I’m jumping cues my mind to adjust the speed of the rope. Another small adjustment that should make a big difference.
My cousin DE and I hid behind some bushes, but one of the large green beings seemed to sense us, he kept sniffing the bushes like he could smell us; and eventually he saw me, and my cousin DE ran to distract him.
Be bold to tell you that I am your son;
In its SPC filing strategy, Yeda attempted to cover two options, by filing one SPC application that identified the product merely as "cetuximab" and another application for "cetuximab in combination with irinotecan". The UK IPO refused both SPC applications.
_____________________
The director, I'm told, was a one-time indie music video director, which thankfully didn't translate into an MTV-inspired mess. It may have influenced the soundtrack though, which was low-key and unobtrusive, and composed by unfamiliar bands. However, in an inspired if surreal moment, Aerosmith blares in the background when one of our characters gets their hand caught in a moving garbage disposal! (I can't tell you the title of the song, because I was never much of an Aerosmith fan except for those videos that featured Alicia Silverstone in her hottie heyday).
Third lesson. We discuss some of the forces acting on the helicopter and the rotor. Different types of rotors and some other stuff out of the FAA's FAA-H-8083-21 Rotorcraft Flying Handbook. Part of me is thinking he's trying to distract me from my impending doom.
I can do that. I can look back and go, "I did everything I could've possibly done to ensure the success of my book."
Fred walked down the forest path and by midday was near enough to watch the subjects of the kingdom. Not wishing to modify their behavior by his presence he stood at the edge of the shadowed forest. For several days he monitored the movements of the populace.
Under our form of government the use of property and the making of contracts are normally matters of private and not of public concern. The general rule is that both shall be free of governmental interference. But neither property rights nor contract rights are absolute; for government cannot exist if the citizen may at will use his property to the detriment of his fellows, or exercise his freedom of contract to work them harm. Equally fundamental with the private right is that of the public to regulate it in the common interest.
Many thanks for making a documentary film on the Buddha, the Prince of Peace and Compassion. We would particularly like to thank the award-wining filmmaker David Grubin for making a film on such a matter of profound significance. We also understand the film is being aired by PBS – Public Broadcasting Service – on April 7th, 2010 with its nearly 360 member stations all over the United States of America and 110 million people through their local stations and nearly 19 million people online are expected to watch it.
Challenges: As a full-time stay-at-home-mom, going on a vacation with your 3 kids is kind of like going on a business trip (to quote Claire Dunphy from “Modern Family” – a TV show Rob & I have just discovered and watch every night after the kids go to bed). Here’s why:
They then drove him to the town center where he was made to wear a sign naming him as a thief. He was paraded in front of startled shoppers before being taking 350 yards to the police station, where he was arrested on suspicion of theft.
on blueberry hill,
The third part of the wrapper is just blank space, it is the section that the top portion will attached to, so it will be tucked underneath it all. So after you design all your wrappers, print them and cut them; it's time to get everything else ready to put it all together.
–no buff/debuff timers. And buffs(“boons”)/debuffs are generally very short. eg. a stun might last 2 seconds.
Acid is necessary in preserving not only for flavor and texture, but in preventing bacterial growth. In making pickles, acid is an important part of the fermentation process. In fruit preserves, lemon juice is typically used as the acid, while vinegar is more common in vegetable preserves. Preserves made with low-acid foods must be processed in a pressure canner to prevent any bacteria from growing
According to the public service code of conduct, a government employee is guilty of misconduct if he or she does paid work without permission from a head of department.
This is simpler, yet more effective than most expert-driven methods in “international development.” None of his solutions were suggested by outsiders, nor evaluated, nor funded as a concept on its own. Funding goes into scholarships (the ultimate reward for individual performance) but the rest of the system is community and volunteer driven. It works because Gichuki builds upon solid foundations – by starting with the child, listening to the child, working with the school, orienting parents, and inviting community elders to participate in guiding the community’s children.
but was driving at a ridiculous 70 mph!
You might also notice the use of I used one of the backing papers that came with the freebies from Crafters Companion.
Even before privatization cranked into full gear here, it was tough finding motivated teachers - low pay didn't really compensate for the long hours, the many out-of-pocket expenses, and the largely inadequate facilities many teachers had in the New Orleans public schools pre-8-29-2005. The testing manias, the rage for TFA-ers over certified, diploma'd teachers, and the low pay plus little-to-no benefits make the atmosphere for motivated teachers even more stifling in the traditional public schools and the charters. A move towards Mavericks-style setups here in Louisiana would only work if the old GIGO was taken into account - that is, "garbage in-garbage out." From both the student end AND the teacher's end of the virtual classroom, if you throw garbage at each other, all that will come from it is a virtual landfill. The one-on-one via PC is not close to perfect unless embraced fully by both student and teacher...and I don't think we're even close to that situation in many of the traditional teacher-student relationships, much less the virtual ones.
Lastly came dessert! My weakness! (I love everything that’s bad for you!) It was a very hard choice at this stage as I could hardly breathe already so I had to make my choices count. I ended up with – mini fruit tart, mini macaron, egg tart (I don’t know why I included that in dessert), mini cakes (tiramisu, blueberry cheesecake & some others I’ve forgotten) & fruit (kiwi, rockmelon, honeydew melon). I halved all this with hubby of course – because if I didn’t I would have either wasted the half of everything on the plate or wasted some of the selection altogether. Also, I had sample bites of some of the flavoured ice cream on the stick. Some of the flavours included were melon, mango, coconut, durian. I liked melon the most.
I’m attending a lecture today given by DeeDee Halleck, an expert in public access television programing and the use of communications in grassroots development. You can follow along here.
I couldn't find a print, so I guess it's
Nothing really bad happened...so far. Touch wood. Except for the part where I went grocery shopping.
It is his second score on the board!
I pushed up hard, climbing out of the hole I had made and falling backwards away from it. I scuttled across the war-torn, too-green lawn of an enormous castle-structure. The shadow showed its owner. The monstrous man held the offending hammer, bringing it back for another swing. He ran straight at me.
The man behind pop/punk superstar group Osaka Popstar, singer John Cafiero, started the band as a way to unite his love of music and cartoons, not to mention the fact that it gave him the opportunity to play with some of punk rock's (and his) heroes. With Marky Ramone (of the Ramones) and Richard Hell (the Voidoids) on drums, Jerry Only (the Misfits) on bass, and Dez Cadena (Black Flag) and Ivan Julian (Richard Hell & the Voidoids) on guitars, Osaka Popstar released their debut album, fittingly titled Osaka Popstar and the American Legends of Punk, in 2006. Cafiero also worked closely with cartoonists and animators John Pound, Mari-chan, and Joel Veitch in developing the album art and the two music videos included on the record.
I recently reorganized my makeup and realized the almost disgusting amount of blush I have... I didn't realize I was a blush hoarder. That said, I've really been trying to use a bit of everything in my collection, starting with blushes that I love, but don't use enough. Peaceful is a peachy-pink blush with a fine glowing shimmer. The shade was exclusive to QVC, but may be available elsewhere by now.
I also came across this, it's in a book shop rather than a Library but it's pretty spectacular!
This post appeared with a picture of a handsome young man in a uniform on an ad that popped up on one of my free email sites. I don’t know if it was just a come-on for an eager, available and lonely woman, or if it was a sincere search. But it started me thinking.
Life here in the capital has changed so dramatically in last few years. It is sad to see that a Muslim or a Kashmiri will not find a place on rent so easily in the capital. People are skeptical , judgmental and prejudiced at times.
Why do the people he ran against hate him so much… why the bitterness? The main reason is that Republicans don’t really believe Mitty stands for anything. They think he’s a fake (or as Chris Matthews says “An empty suit trying to look like a conservative.”
don't always have the time to make bolognese sauce and sometimes I just want a lighter
once you've turned your dough
There is moon, and sea . . .
future literature will be judged by anyone who has the ability to grasp the
Happy hair accessory organizing to you !
All the complexities of life took a backseat whenever he had a rendezvous with nature. Unlike other boys of his age, he had always been a romantic person at heart. Nature and its serenity had always helped him in clearing his mind. But most of the people were unaware of this, including Iqra.
the very tiring jumping;
September 29: The FDA ordered that labeling for the “ADHD” drug Strattera include a boxed warning about the increased risk of suicidal thinking in children and adolescents taking it.
I, for one, am thrilled it's Friday.
Anyway, I read this girl Alexi is going through a breakup. We all know how hard breakups are, so if you're going through one or are divinely happy in a relationship or stunningly single or sadly single, read this blog. It's fun. And maybe leave her some comments of cheerfulness and love cause lord knows having "it's called breakup because it's broken" is the most humiliating thing to have at your bedside, I'd rather hear it from real people!
The last few weeks I'm looking at more lace shawls and lace garments. One that has been on the list to knit for some time is the Triangular Summer Shawl seen here. I plan to hand spin Cormo and leave it undyed. Lace weight spinning is becoming my favorite lately so why not enjoy the spinning and knitting this beautiful shawl with my own handspun? The next is the Myrtle cardigan, and maybe the Batik pullover.
She braves
Answers are the questions that ate the laws of gravity on the leaves of super consciousness
Shortly I am going to post a video I made for the 20sb vlog day so be sure to check it out.
Absolutely! We had nighttime wetting here for a looooong time and just recently, Clay has been having issues with occasional wetting after being completely dry at night for well over a year. The GoodNites NiteLite Panel has been talking about bedtime routines and things you can do to enjoy some special bonding time with your child before bedtime. If you want to join the conversation about bedwetting and things you can do to ensure your child has a good night, come visit the Special Bedtime Moments page on Gather.com HERE.
We’re told over and over again that it is a “scientific fact” that homosexuals are born gay and therefore it’s clearly okay to be gay.
The Iraq protests were different from many of the revolts sweeping the Middle East and North Africa in that demonstrators were calling for reform, and not to get rid of the government. Their demands ranged from more electricity and jobs to ending corruption, reflecting a dissatisfaction with government that cuts across sectarian and class lines.
We're going to run with the apparent certainty of West Virginia's entry into the league again here. Vanderbilt heads to the ACC with UConn, Rutgers, Army, and Navy to round out their own mega-conference. Virginia Tech, Clemson and Florida State pack up their pigskins and head to greener pastures.
Today by special request,…..I have made a Magnolia card to share…….yes I know I have been a little neglectful on my blog with the old Maggie's……..but I can assure you it is not the case behind the scenes, as I am currently working on my projects for the next Magnolia Ink, so believe me when I say…..they are everywhere on my desk LOL……
~ Urban Decay Primer Potion
And to show the world the embarrassing photographic evidence, of course.
Home advantage counted for nothing as Bayern Munich dumped host, Real Madrid out of the UEFA Champions League at the Santiago Bernebeu on penalties. The gruelling semi-final started with Khedira getting an early shot on target after being fed by Di Maria who went to the by-line and pushing a cut-back.
It’s a question worth asking yourself; and your answer might surprise you! Do Christians have the right to expect an agreeable agenda? I hardly think so, as my understanding of the Bible does not include promises that bad things will never happen. But what do you think? And how will you respond to your circumstances turning sour? Will you hand the events back to God and demand an easy way out…or will you thank Your Jesus for being there for you to rely on and for considering you worthy of enduring suffering?
And our lives have never been the same since!
So, we have our setting, our protagonist, and our emotional stake. What else do we need?
Liane Moriarty
Robert Louis Stevenson was a Scottish writer born in 1850. He became a Victorian celebrity for publishing such works as The Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde, Treasure Island, and Kidnapped. Stevenson grew up a sickly child that used his imagination to compose adventures stories even at a young age. As an adult, although his constitution was weak, Stevenson traveled around the world and used these travels as inspiration for his works. He died at the age of 44 in Samoa.
Ban will also visit Aung San Suu Kyi for the first time and will discuss what kind of support Myanmar wants from the United Nations.
I took this one under a little better lighting conditions. I'm about 1/3 of the way done on the coloring. I have to work from the top left down to the bottom right so that I don't smear the colored pencil. It has a wax base so it will melt and make quite a mess if I lay my hand across it too long. I always like to see how the coloring really brings the image to life.
I'm planning on more subbing this week or certainly next.
We want it to happen fast.
And we know they are with us, as You’ve been from the start
Dark Shadows is Depp’s latest work, his eighth film with director Tim Burton. Based off the television series of the same name that ran from 1966-1971, Depp stars as Barnabas Collins, a man who’s cursed to be a vampire to suffer for all eternity.
Did I get too busy? Well, maybe; but school hasn't stopped me this drastically in the past. Did I stop liking fiber? NO. I still love the colors, the feel, the way it seems like magic when you make something out of it. I just didn't want to make anything out of it.
- In Afghanistan the Taliban militia banned women from wearing white socks just in case men find them attractive. The police are also ordered windows to be painted black to stop women being seen from the outside.
Heat eggnog in a microwave-safe container for about 1 minute. Add the shot of espresso and the warmed eggnog to your mug. If desired, add spiced rum. Stir and dust with cinnamon.
In a Grande Hotel for Grannies./
Here is the complete list of poets featured in the current Poem Gallery:
3. There seems to be a travel theme throughout the planner. Most of the pictures inside have stamps or luggage or things relating to places, pretty much like what you see on the outside cover.
I will give you an example. Next time you are with a baby watch how the baby is alert and absorbing everything in their vicinity without judgement. Watch how they are looking in awe of everything around them. Take them outside. Place them under a tree and watch as they are completely captivated. When is the last time you REALLY looked at a tree, or on that note anything? If you look with your full being the experience is breathtaking. Our problem is that we mentally label everything. And once we label things we stop looking deeply. We lose depth in our perception of things. We look at the tree, and label it “tree” and don’t look again. We are missing all the beauty, magic, abundance, and life around us. If we live solely from the mind, life becomes dull.
The Copic Coloring Guide is a new book by Colleen Schaan and Marianne Walker. It's the perfect resource for beginner and intermediate coloring artists alike. The book contains information about the different styles of Copic markers, explains the coloring/numbering system, details how to pick good blending groups, teaches a number of blending techniques through illustrated tutorials, and de-mistifies the colorless blender marker. And that's just in the first 18 pages! The book also contains over 40 beautiful coloring card projects separated into beginner, intermediate and advanced skill level. Each card project includes step-by-step coloring AND assembly instructions... along with supply lists and manufacturer information to make recreating the projects simple and easy.
-This dude was my hero. All those who bitched about jams and closed roads, look at this dude,. People in crutches and wheelchairs turned up, but you losers stayed home. Shame on you.
Okay, I've heard this and frankly, I've had a very hard time believing it. I've tried quite a few brands and types of pencils and I have yet to find a pencils that would not blend. That includes watercolor pencils and your standard #2 graphite writing pencil my monster uses for school. I don't have any pencils manufactured in Mexico so I can't say for sure what the problem is with the people who have reported it. I know it has scared a few people. If you're concerned, try Derwent pencils. They're very proudly made in England and I've had great results with them.
Thank you for being so kind to me on my last post ~
I love Garaging (going to garage sales) and it's become addictive. For now it's on hold since we are closing on a new house (to us) in a week and a half and we are running out of space to store my "projects". Stay tuned though, I will start posting other finished ones and the not finished so you guys can bug me to finish them :)
And don't forget .............. leave a comment to win.
Dan- I jammed with him for 2 nights and his enthusiasm for the hostel really shows in everything he does. I can’t wait for him to get working on some of the new ideas they have for the hostel!
Your brain stem was broken. And blood has seeped to the deepest parts of your brain. They couldn’t do anything anymore.
Jim Delany is one scary sumbitch.
How far along: 25 weeks
About five minutes later, I saw a restaurant over on the side of the road, a neon highlighted sign spread across its roof. The sign read,
Happy Holidays from my family to yours!
Would you like to hear a story with a happy ending? A modern day fairy tale, as it were?
You can also use the cookie cuter to create different shapes!!
Tufty the Cat
Hunt translates:
I don't know about you... but when I cook rice, it sometimes turns out mushy... I still eat it... but when I was lead to this product at TJ's... I was hooked...
To get back to our theme of socialist nationalism, or nationalist socialism.
Therapist: Looks like it lost my lengthy message as well. Good grief. If I can remember all I said. Did you get a message about setting a plan or safety word for your daughter?
1. Being inspired by people with a RADIATE SPARK: Gabrielle Bernstein, Danielle LaPorte, Mastin Kipp, Eckhart Tolle- any person who is pursuing making a positive, effective, and memorable change.
Yesterday, my 12 yr old daughter had an incident at school. When she asked her teacher for extra work because she had finished early, she was told there was nothing for her and she should just "Go sit at her desk and be pretty."
Do you set “rules” for yourself regarding how you mention your children and social media? What are they? Do you think it’s possible to gossip about your own kids? Or does gossip only apply to talking about those outside your family?
“Respect, renew, and refresh. Take time to rest and love the bodies that you are occupying for this physical experience you participate in. Too many times we see them abused or neglected. We wish to just remind you that there are many more experiences ahead. Live through them making the healthy choices that will enhance the journey of this life you have chosen. Doing so will allow you to focus on the sacred contract you have laid out for yourself with zest and focus.”
Mesdan makes a face. “I would have sent up the signal, but there was no time. It was a shapeshifter, Kesta. What could I have done?”
A CAS card which makes me wish I had the PTI linen impression plate so I could add a subtle bit of texture on the large white panel. But alas, no such template (yet LOL!) so it stayed plain old, smooth white - gasp!
6. And finally, Dark Chocolate Icing
It’s a matter of prescience no, not the science fiction kind
Today there were 2 charity rides. I could only do one and that pissed people off. I have to stay true to myself and do what I want to do. I refuse to have people dictate to me. The one I chose had 1500 riders. Two accidents, one bad. The bad one went down right behind me and I heard it and saw it. Lets just say that put a huge damper on the overlong run of 62 miles all around South Florida. Then I had to pull off and pee in middle of the ride when I realized that the ride was not ending anytime soon. Plus I was over the run by that point. When I tried to jump back in at the end after taking pictures the cops got nasty,wouldn't let me rejoin the group and threatened me. I got pissed and left.
"Hey, I've got to be true to me," he says.
let the mountains move.
While we weren’t haunted by ghosts, the night we stayed at the Shaffer one of the women that worked at the hotel was being stalked by an ex-boyfriend who threatened to shoot everyone inside. He drove by a couple times and the police were called. At one point, while eating in the restaurant, we were asked to step away from the front window. For a few minutes we drank our tea by the cash register, waiting to see which way things would go. But, in the end, there was no gunfire at the Shaffer that night, surely how Pop would prefer it.
The other bottle was something of a mystery. Port Jeff is a small brewpub on the north coast of Long Island. They have seven regular beers, but Cold North Wind barley wine isn't one of them. Richard didn't know if the bottle he got was new, aged or what: just that the proprietor was keen for him to have it.
The winner for the 4 images Winner's choice is.......
I hadn't realized that raising the curtain between you and the show was the last thing they do...so not only was I was naked from the waist down in a room full of people, it really FELT like it. At least if the curtain had been there, I could have been in denial. Chris took pictures and I'm going to link to one of them, but warning it WOULD be graphic if my giant belly wasn't in the way. Actually, screw it, I'll just post it. It's that funny to me that I'll risk offending the majority of the reading public.
Cooking the tomatoes in the skillet (instead of just adding them raw) concentrates their flavour. They lose some water and become something really wonderful. If you wanted to, you could roast them in the oven instead, but why dirty another pan? Why turn on another appliance? There's no need for all of that. One tomato-ey bite lifted the fog from my brain and I was suddenly back among the living.
Dionne: omg that was painful to watch
Tiffany is not allowed on the carpet or the furniture. She's a bright little pup and seems to understand these rules. She manages to get around them by being too adorable. See, I can't scold her for being on the sofa because she is actually laying on Ducky.
How do you want this space to feel?
Recently I wanted to know the oldest functional temple in India. I tried to make some research but mostly I came across with the temples which were either tourist attractions or were in the cloud through its web sites. My curiosity has brought some results:
Regardless of what the grieving woman is wearing (come on, latex or not, it’s a pretty amazing look for a funeral), the intensity of her grief is so apparent. And boy, what a life those guys must have lived!
All images are 300 dpi and come in both JPEG & PNG formats
Last week I reached into the mailbox and pulled out something so Anti Me that I literally burst out laughing when I read it. Since it was received unsolicited and unexpectedly, I even checked the address on it to make sure it was delivered to the right house or was, perhaps, some asinine mass-mailer addressed to "Occupant".
David’s mighty men are mentioned by name in Scripture because they helped David, the LORD’s chosen one. (I Chronicles 11-12)
“I do not believe we can repair the basic fabric of society until people who are willing to work have work. Work organizes life. It gives structure and discipline to life.”
Egg salad...
The Kitten's Whiskers is a blog by Laila, who is currently making it her mission to buy all her clothes from charity shops, so her blog is choc full of amazing finds and charity shopping tips. I'm a huge admirer of her ethical shopping mindset, and I fully intend to make more effort to shop in charity shops from now on, partly inspired by her little blog :)
Last I blogged, I included images of the mask I created for The Denver Hospice fundraiser. My mask is now up for auction on The Denver Hospice website and is on display at the Cherry Creek Shopping Mall in Denver. I have one bid so far, but I would love more!
Whisky.
There is a direct line from the anti-bourgeois, anti-nationalist, anti-colonialist anarcho-radical aspirations of Dadaism to Waste Land. But unlike so many post-Dada developments informed by it, Waste Land does not take that first fateful individualistic step that mostly tends to existential absurdity and despairing irony. In the film, recycling is a collective act in more than one sense of the word "collective". The associated labour process that reclaims materials previously designated as useless non-property entails the re-appropriation of these materials as useful. What is more, this transformation is from stuff not having use-value as privately owned property to stuff having use-value as collectively owned property. At the level of use-value, then, the art work is socialist property.
When I followed Weight Watchers, I learned that fiber was great. The more fiber you eat in something, the fewer points it had, which meant that you got to eat more. I liked that. I didn't care about much beyond that.
That is silly of me, especially considering the fact that I just mentioned how much sadness I have about all of this. I think one thing that I am really sad about is that I've stayed in such a situation for so long. I've put myself, and Myles, through hell. My self-esteem was so damaged and I had absolutely no self-love that I accepted things that were not acceptable.
Of course there’s plenty of folks out there who feel that the race isn’t like it used to be before the big cats came on board. But organizers believe they’ve largely avoided the potential problem of weather-related delays that could easily mess up broadcast schedules by switching to catamarans that can sail in a wide range of conditions. Races have been shortened to better fit into TV time slots and will be sailed close to shore.
Until the day he was kidnapped.
- United Nations, Global Biodiversity Assessment
I feel so bad for her. Teething is vile. And of COURSE the Hyland's teething tablets were recalled right when she started this time in her life.
“Dined with Mr Aston.” (Apr 30)
Which house are you?
Florence, Milan, Pisa, Naples, Turin, Genoa, Bologna, and Capri. Hotel Palazzo Sasso in Ravello, Bauer Il Palazzo in Venice, Il San Pietro Hotel in Milan, Capri Palace Hotel & Spa in Capri Island, and Hotel Santa Caterina in Amalfi are regarded as few of the cesana italy accommodation and you do that. You may end up with outrageous bill waiting to be on roaming through your home service provider. In this way the cesana italy accommodation that you have, with Italy cell phone, a package, providing you with unbelievable savings.
In her nubile lack of feminine attire
“The latest weekly animal hygiene report of the Ministry of Agriculture Forestry and Fisheries introduces cases in which sterilizing work has not been properly carried out after vaccinations have been performed. If that’s true, there may be a connection with the latest infections. There’s a need to provide thorough sterilization once again,” Hiroomi Akashi, a professor of veterinary virology at the University of Tokyo said.
Krishnamurti: Wisdom is not in analysis. You suffer, and by analysis you try to find the cause; that is, you are analyzing a dead event, the cause that is already in the past. What you must do is find the cause of suffering in the very moment of suffering. By analyzing suffering you do not find the cause; you analyze only the cause of a particular act. Then you say, “I have understood the cause of that suffering.” But in reality you have only learned to avoid the suffering; you have not freed your mind from it. This process of accumulation, of learning through the analysis of a particular act, does not give wisdom. Wisdom arises only when the “I” consciousness, which is the creator, the cause of suffering, is dissolved. Am I making this difficult?
For forgiveness
Our local left, likes to publish surveys that make Republicans look bad. Power Line’s Steven Hayward brings this Pew Survey to our attention via the Daily Caller
In other words, Mr. Potok’s numbers are meaningless. Who knew?
Anyway, people tend to work out what works for them, depending on their size, speed, talents...and we’re nothing if not adaptable. Some Sithe fight pretty dirty. I could introduce you to a guy called Cuthag. Not one of my favourite people.
Now we have Rosie, and now we have yet another style of training. So far, anyway--at least, in puppy kindergarten--the training has been all treat-training. We give treats for sit and treats for down and treats for wait and treats for this and treats for that, and we play the "drop it!" game in which we distract the pups from chewing on our socks and shoes and other contraband by scattering treats across the ground and merrily singing, "Drop it!" And ostensibly they abandon the sock and scramble after the treats and eventually they will abandon the sock on the command, no treats necessary.
My reluctance to perform in an ensemble also stemmed from watching the previous school concert when I was hosting it. Seeing how some of my juniors struggled on stage and not holding the instrument and the bow correctly, reminds me about myself.
Each side have their own views
The way it's written is a little large, but the lovely thing is that you can replace the 5's with 2's or 3's or anything. In place of the 10 will be whatever is double your replacement of the 5. Get it?
Ginger Peach
I use buttons all the time as embellishments in my sewing projects, and in my paper art. But I also collect them, and these glass buttons in different shapes and colors are a lovely addition to my collection!
We signed the boy up without consulting him, because I'm not sure he knows what soccer is by definition. He loves to play soccer with his brothers in the yard, and he loves watching the kids on the AYSO field play games as we drive by, so we took that as some sort of enthusiasm for the sport.
A gentle reminder also that all my images are copyright, and may only be used with permission, thank you.
I don’t mind, we have such a good time,
Price: $39,800
Happy Monday everyone!
The winning prize will be a whole April Digi Release!! (The winner will be announced over the SNS Digi Challenge Blog on Friday, April 27th.)
On January 31, I posted my first ever post to a blog.
Now obviously having kids everywhere is going to be a constant reminder of why you’re trying to fight the disease, but the kids represent more than that. The lack of parents has left the kids to form a microcosm within the town, and they’re ignoring the stupid grown-ups and engaging in their very own politics and battles.
some third world country who has fallen out of favor with the groups
The law, explained for example in the CÉGEP de Saint-Laurent decision, is quite clear. Student associations do not have the same status as trade unions. They are not entitled to impose their “strike” votes on their members, as trade unions are. Students contract for education services, and pay, however little. They are entitled to have the classes they contract and pay for. They suffer great prejudice if they lose their semester. The protesters, on the other hand, can still protest if they feel like it, despite the injunctions.
Tuesday, 20 March: Tjokkie Venter (34), a farmer in the Harrismith district, was assaulted on the farm Uitvlugt by workers of a farm belonging to the South African National Roads Agency. He was stabbed in the face with a knife and hit on the head with an iron pipe.
He is one of those kids that loves to snuggle, thankfully even still at nine, and really LOVES to just talk. He says this to me all the time. "Let's talk Mom." As far as love languages go, he is quality time all the way.
The first is a tote! I created this project using the Designer Series Paper in the Sale-a-bration catalog as well as some of the in-color card stocks. The tote has been embellished with embossing, a couple of brads, and a little distressing.
After two doses of morphine her color returns and she eats the first food she has had in a couple of days. She's put on a drip and the treatment starts. X-rays are done and she's made comfortable.
The battery is right along the coast and it has cannons and was obviously the main area of town over 200 years ago (possibly sooner). Anyway, pictures are better than me narrating so enjoy!
1 medium onion, diced fine
I cut out the tags from white cardstock using my Cricut, then sponged them with Antique Linen and Brushed Corduroy Distress Inks, I've stamped several mini stamps with Sepia Versafine added lace and jute cord, Tildas have been coloured with Copics and a sprinkling of Glamour Dust.
Brown talks a big game on morals and personal character yet he is frequently shown up on these very characteristics. He, his staff and his government have been caught out countless times for lying and it is an ingrained characteristic of this Labour Government that they will only speak to their version of events, and their version of the truth. This is of course never an accurate reflection of real life, of the real situation, of the real statistics or experiences of people. In the conversation with Mrs Duffy today he was untruthful to her. When she asked what he was going to do about the debt he replied he would cut in in half in four years. The Labour policy as I have written about before is in fact not to cut debt in four years, but to cut the deficit in four years. A liar to the very end.
5. Green chilies, 1-2.
Oh yeah! And don't forget to click HERE and send our your FREE holiday greeting ecards! For every greeting you send, Kraft will donate 10 meals to Feeding America!
Passion....learning (I was/am that kid)
Could the 10 brothers have known what went on in Joseph's life after they sold him into slavery? Or if it had been written in Joseph's POV (first person), he couldn't have known the plotting of his brothers or their feelings afterward. By making it third person, we get a rounder picture of the entire story, but we don't have the warm, private picture of Joseph.
However (now seriously) – some distinctions must be made.
are not stupid. you loved a man
How's that for a carbon footprint?
.: If for one minute you think you’re better than a sixteen year old girl in a Green Day t-shirt, you are sorely mistaken. Remember the first time you went to a show and saw your favorite band. You wore their shirt, and sang every word. You didn’t know anything about scene politics, haircuts, or what was cool. All you knew was that this music made you feel different from anyone you shared a locker with. Someone finally understood you. This is what music is about :.
(Jesus is Prince of Peace)
First stop, Restoration Hardware. I fell in love with one of their giant sofas on-line, and, of course,
Östgaard HC, Andersson GBJ, Schultz AB, Miller JAA. Influence of some biomechanical factors on low back pain in pregnancy. Spine 1993; 18: 61-65.
So wish me luck at the doctor's office tomorrow and maybe, if I'm a very lucky girl, I'll be able to write the post for Wednesday.
Time is a constant irrational surd of Kali
In the airport... we accompanied my sister and my nephew during their check in. It is different here in the United States because they are more lenient. Back in Manila, the only people who can go inside the airport are the people who either works there or is a passenger.
My other epiphany was while I was reading my devotional this morning. I was upset with my husband for taking the keys to the old house with him to work for the 2nd time and then I read this:
Finally, it struck me that free speech and its concomitant — democratization — cannot be separated from cultural, political and economic progress.
Last year at this time I was preparing for a trip to Rome. Beautiful Rome! And I was deciding whether to take just a sweater or if I should also throw in a light jacket in case of rain. Rain! Don't I look warm? I miss those days. Those warm March days.
Something about the way he said it,used my name,sounded so sincere just empowered me. I realized he was right. I do know myself better than anyone. There is no reason why I shouldn't believe what I feel and know to be true.
Ok, for those of you who've never had dandelion bread before, which included me up until now, it's really tasty! After pouring the batter in the tin, I feared it might be too bitter, but the baking of it made that bitterness disappear. It turned out really nice, and I'm quite proud of this.
I am smashed against a screen as two technicians take the chest x ray and shuffle me back into the room and out in to the waiting room.
We all know the brilliant tracking shot that opens The Letter--how it finally comes to rest on a cockatoo, which flies off, startled, at the sound of the first shot from Bette Davis's gun. Another shot, the workers stir, then the camera moves in toward the plantation house and shows a man who clutches himself as he staggers down the steps, Bette Davis in pursuit as she empties her revolver into him, her face an impassive executioner's mask that each viewer must spend the rest of the movie interpreting.
► 2010 (173)
So.....I am sneaking to my craft room so I can post this before the day is over! hehehe! Don't tell my hubby! I'm supposed to be helping sort through things in the basement to pack for our move, but this is day three of the "sort and pack adventure"! I'm so sick of looking at boxes!
Peel the kiwifruits. Cut each into 8 wedges and add to the oranges and grapefruits. Add the cooled liquid and raisins, remove the vanilla pod and stir.
Aside from accessibility, however, there are other attractions to these meets. For starters, they all have relay competition - and I love watching relays! Most meets have the traditional 4x1 and 4x4, but this early part of the season you can find lots of meets that run almost every kind of relay imaginable. Distance runners get to run relays with 4 x 800, distance medleys, and even 4 x 1600. Field event competitors too, with long jump, high jump, shot put, and discus relays (and others) where the marks of four competitors are totaled together to determine a team winner. It all leads to tremendous excitement.
Starting your own Stampin' Up! business means free and discounted products, plus a little extra cash--and who couldn't use that? Plus, from July 15 - August 31, you can become a Stampin' Up! demonstrator for only $85!
screenshot 1am 4/23/2012:
The bride cried. Not big sobs, but the tears and quivering lip routine.
As Ever
The day started going down hill though, my mom had a rash, that kept getting worse, come to find out she had something that had some mushrooms in it, which she is allergic too. Somehow this wasn't on her chart, so they didn't know (GRRR) she was allergic. Thank goodness it isn't a life threatening allergy! They had been trying to treat it, but nothing was helping, so they decided she needed to go to the hospital. She has been there since Tues afternoon and is scheduled to be released today. The good is they changed the meds and the rash seems to be getting better, the bad, her blood pressure has been crazy high (which she has a problem for and is on meds) so they had a heart dr come in as well. They put a monitor on (she has issues with AFIB and in general caused the strokes in March) to keep a check, did an Echo etc, came back fine.
The walls angle downward towards the loo,
So we headed to Home Depot to get the rest of the supplies. The most important supply was a tool we were missing: a skill saw to make the cuts. So we paid the $40 and got one, finally (it's not like we'll never use it again!)
Dotterel Press is a very small press in the UK founded in 2009 by Tim Atkinson and Gareth Dearson. They describe Dotterel Press as a social enterprise initiative designed to help bring new and talented authors to the attention of a small, discerning readership.
Finger nail art has come a long way since my time with the crazy nails.
You were a disappointment.
Finally, I just wanted to remind you that it's my turn to post my first proper DT project over on the Snazzys DT Blog. If you would like to have a look click on the picture of Snazzys in my sidebar. Here's a little peek.
Dad was screaming disgustedly about goop coming out of them as he stomped on them and Mom was gesturing for me to come inside. I couldn’t move. I was frozen in my tracks. I couldn’t take one step forward, lest the goop “get” me or a caterpillar fell on my head. I literally think it took the better side of an hour to get me in the house. I nearly had a tantrum out of intense fear. I just knew that the one giant caterpillar over the door was going to flop off and touch me.
Ken Livingstone spent tens of thousands of pounds of public money as London Mayor on first class air travel, luxury hotels, fine wines and even a £260 pair of shoes.
In a stand or electric mixer, beat butter and sugars until well combined. Add eggs and vanilla, beating until well combined. Place flour, baking soda, and salt into a large bowl. Add to wet ingredients along with cocoa powder, and chocolate chunks, slowly mixing until just combined. Drop dollops of frozen peanut butter into dough and turn mixer on for just a few turns of the mixer to get swirls of peanut butter through the dough. With a medium cookie scoop, scoop dough onto prepared baking sheet, about 1 inch apart from each other. Bake for 14 to 16 minutes, until cooked through. Let cool on baking sheet for 5 minutes before transferring to a cooling rack. Serve with milk.
Chris Couchois – drums
Journalists Willem van der Berg and Pieter Steyn of Volksblad newspaper reported that the “suspended” ANC youth league leader Julius Malema, now elected as a senior member of the influential Limpopo ANC's executive committee, and thus more powerful than ever before, has launched into one of his by now world-infamous rampages against “white owned” mining houses and repeated his demands that all “white-owned” land must be confiscated.
John is baffled. "But dad, I moved out five years ago. In fact, this is the first time I've been back." He looks over at mother, who shrugs and says, "You know dear, your brother has his own business. He set up an accountancy firm."
“With eBay always looking at new ways to engage brands and retailers with the consumer, I’m sure we’ll see eBay’s UK site continue to outpace the average ecommerce growth in other countries. It’s a very exciting time to be an online retailer.”
Walls needed repainting big time. A combination of neglect (working in Gib), humidity, and dust, had left them looking very sad and dilapidated. Still, have painter as partner and it was all soon as good as new. Took less time to paint the walls than it did to sort the wretched papers, and dust off all the books.
DATE and TIMES: Saturday, May 26, 2012 from 9:30am-12:00pm
In my very first week of blogging, I posted that "work has been underway for six months now and several rooms are nearing completion". In retrospect, that comment lay somewhere between highly optimistic and slightly delusional. Eighteen months on, and with a greatly enhanced awareness of the realities of renovating, we are (finally) ready for our first Chambers Before & After (sincere thanks for your patience lovely readers!).
Hayes allegedly then picked up a tree branch and demanded the victim give them his belongings, saying, “Empty your pockets, white boy.”
One product is used to cut down on the hen house ammonia smell (something that could come in handy for backyard poultry owners) and another product protects chickens against fleas, mites, and lice. We haven’t had a problem with any of those pesky little critters to date but I think it’s more a matter of luck than anything else. The day will come and I’d rather be forearmed with knowledge than run around looking for sometime that might help.
I've been doing a lot of talk about goals, and I think it's about time I give myself some homework. I am going to learn a new song every day I have free time and post it online for the sole purpose of critique. I've been wanting to take lessons for singing, but I put those same mental roadblocks up that I rail against. This is the path of a detour.
Since planting my spuds, the rain hasn't stopped and rain isn't always a good thing. Especially if you grow on heavy clay.
So (thanks to your suggestions) we spent this weekend trying everything imaginable to coax this kid into position, including...
My oldest is at the dentist getting his first filling today.
“I’m curious to see where she is going next. I’d be the first one to call them and give them a heads up: Better get your affairs in order.”
If I had two ovens, this would be a moot point. One oven becomes the turkey oven, and all the other fixings can share space in the multi-purpose oven. Brilliant.
If you have arrived here from Dandy's blog then your on the right track but if not then please start back HERE at Beckys blog .
I was hard pressed and was falling,
Vampire, shy at first, harrasses the children in his attempt to “play.” He hides under their beds and in the bushes. (Isn’t that cute?) He follows mother to the grocery store and then disguises himself as the cashier. But eventually, he endears himself to the whole family, hiding in closets upside-down to avoid his chores, allowing the children to push him around in a baby buggy, and even donning a frilly yellow bonnet and blue dress sewed for him by mother. The smiling milkman, making his delivery to the family, thoughtfully includes one jug of red liquid for them. “Look here,” says Sally. “One is for Dick. One is for Jane. One is for vampire.” And of course, a vampire is nothing without a love interest, even in a children’s book, so in the end, Dick and Jane drag vampire by his cape to a park bench to introduce him to their new friend…a pasty-faced hot chick in a black dress.
The turning point in your life is here.
We took her to the St. Patty's Day parade in Roanoke with some friends this past weekend and she was dancing up a storm! Every time a band would come by she'd show off her awesome dance moves. She absolutely loved the parade and waved to everyone as they walked by. She was especially excited about the horses and the group of dalmatians and grey hounds that were in the parade. She had a blast! (Pictures to come, they are currently stuck in my camera until I find my camera cord).
Others followed Hofstadter’s lead. Merle Curti in The Growth of American Thought argued that Social Darwinism “admirably suited the needs of the great captains of industry, who were crushing the little fellows when these vainly tried to compete with them.” Henry Steel Commager wrote in The American Mind that “Darwin and Spencer exercised such sovereignty over America as George III had never enjoyed.” And of course Robert Reich has said that Social Darwinism “offered a perfect moral justification for America’s Gilded Age, when robber barons controlled much of American industry, the gap between the rich and poor turned into a chasm, urban slums festered, and politicians were bought off by the wealthy. . . . The modern Conservative Movement has embraced Social Darwinism with no less fervor than it has condemned Darwinism.”
Yes I recognize this project is getting more and more ghetto. Don't judge.
Tickets for the King's Men concert tour
We’re even less impressed with DAP’s unkept campaign promises and Pua’s pretentious acting as if everything is fine with DAP. DAP is a LIAR who cannot keep campaign promises meaning the 2 term limitless oligarchs shamelessly running a political party as a family business are at the centre of the b.s.. Again the obsession with people’s money rather than Dewan oriented or national issues like ending apartheid.
Isaiah 9:2
Additional points on my position: Usually snuggled deep under a worn comforter, no top sheet, only the fitted sheet tucked, and a pillow that will stand up to a lot of thrashing.
I would urge each and every one of them to vote, and vote for the politician who best suits their ideals … someone who is prepared to serve the people and not manipulate voters by trading on fear and hatred.
DEPRIVED CHILDREN
1 peoples
when I hear myself sing
No, we’re not talking about the daily drama unfolding at Meadow Creek in Dracut, we’re talking about Shaker Hills, once named the No. 1 public course in Massachusetts.
"That does smell very good. I assume this is sausage-pepperoni,” Leno joked, and added "it's not bad," after taking a few bites. "It would be better with sausage and pepperoni."
The conversation started with the evils of mass consumerism, then moved on to Le Canard the French sytirical weekly paper and apparently the only dependable source for political information, to politics in general and how everyone in the government is a 'con'.
Leaving the luxury mall at rushhour, we drove at snail's pace past the small children - aged around three, five and eight, - begging for money from the drivers. SecondBorn gets it, that that's where they live, on the street. But was loth to part with his bit of the pizza, which is a rare and relished treat for us here.
While Thy love is left to me;
Thus, I approached AKB0048 with a view of at least finding one idol to approximate one of the least of Macross’ roster: Ranka Lee. The second episode showed me that the search would be challenging but not because all the candidates are of poor stuff. Conceptually at least, the AKB0048 roster of idols are necessarily awesome.
Michael Ritter is a fascinating character for his take on the East German experience of the newly unified Germany in 1992. It’s far more common to read of former East Germans who were terrorised and tortured, physically and / or psychologically, during this period of Germany’s history. Ritter, however, is proudly East German; he defends the GDR’s reputation and the means used to protect the country against its aggressors. Moreover, he’s disgusted by the blatant inequality caused by the influx of capital into East Germany.
This evening was a case in point; we skyped with my sister, and it became clear that my parents had been in touch with her by text and email during their visit here, sharing stories they thought were funny and which I just considered everyday happenings. The following story - which I was a part of - was told back to me, and blow me if it didn't seem a great deal funnier in the retelling than it had whilst I was in the middle of it*.
I work in a large building surrounded by an island of asphalt parking lot, and surrounded by more such buildings floating on asphalt. Somehow, over the months, I've learned to enjoy my walks around this building. It has almost become a time of meditation, and I always feel rejuventated. I often have insightful revelations during these walks if I allow myself to just relax and open up.
As Hannah Ryan waits for her family to return home from a camping trip, she realizes she has everything going for her—a husband other women admire, two charming teenage daughters, and a loving Christian home. As the sunny afternoon turns into twilight, her uneasiness grows along with the shadows. Then a car pulls into Hannah’s driveway, bringing two police officers...and devastating news that shatters her life forever.
Let your self get lost in these images. I'll even send you one free to see just what I am talking about! Let me hear from you. You might even have other suggestions....anything is possible:)
Boris Johnson – Tories. Mental hair. Current incumbent. Bit of a mental tosser. But he’s not as bad as the fuckwit Ken. I honestly think nobody could be – well, perhaps the Yogic Flying nutters.
“You see how widespread the floodwaters are and how affected Emerald is, how many houses have been affected,” she declared. “The patches that are not covered by floodwaters are a lot less than the area that is covered by floodwaters, so it’s a very tough time in Emerald.”
but i will be honest. just one short year ago, i found myself in a very different–and very dark–place.
For sale: Baby shoes, Never worn.
It was the key. Not Czechoslovakia later on. It was Hungary. After that, I had no doubt about the fact that, with all the defects there were in the West, we still had to resist. So, my books were... I suppose today you mustn't use the words, "He was passionate"! Please! "Passionate" must never be used in anything you write about me! But I woke up about it. And I wanted to write detective stories which were fun, but translate them into espionage stories. I mean, obviously I was influenced by Le Carré, obviously I was influenced by Len Deighton, both of whom I thought wrote brilliantly – in their early phase. Le Carré's Tinker, Tailor, Soldier, Spy is one of my favourite books.
When the people saw the thunder and lightning and heard the trumpet and saw the mountain in smoke, they trembled with fear. They stayed at a distance and said to Moses, “Speak to us yourself and we will listen. But do not have God speak to us or we will die.” (Exodus 20:18–19) Frankly, many Christians are way more comfortable with a God who is easygoing, calming, and smells like daffodils than we are with the God who thunders, commands and smells like smoke. We sing songs that say “In His presence, there is comfort…” and “I can hear the brush of angel’s wings” because “surely the presence of the Lord is in this place.” And there is nothing wrong with those songs. We do come into God’s presence with “confidence to enter the Most Holy Place by the blood of Jesus, by a new and living way opened for us through the curtain, that is, his body” (Heb 10:19-20). But while Jesus provides the way into God’s presence, we must remember that God is the same God that shook the mountain.
- I do not share his beliefs on how to re-work the healthcare system in America;
In 1965, it acquired Amana Refrigeration, Inc., a manufacturer of refrigerators and air conditioners. Using the Amana brand name and its distribution channels, Raytheon began selling the first countertop household microwave oven in 1967 and became a dominant manufacturer in the microwave oven business. (SOURCE: Wikipedia) Wouldn't you have liked to see the salesman's catalogue?
In a Facebook post, which has since been removed pending a formal complaint, the girl’s family noted that agents accused the child of potentially having a handgun in her possession when she ran to hug her grandmother during the screening process.
I hope you have Town Meeting on May 9 on your calendar. We will need every vote possible to move the wastewater issues along.
After the 24 Hours of Le Mans, Audi plans to enter an R18 e-tron quattro and an R18 ultra in the FIA World Endurance Championship (WEC). André Lotterer and Allan McNish have been nominated as the drivers so far.
Now see? this post about "Pam", on Eartha Kitsch's blog, just gets me. About how everything we are, gets thrown out, or if we are lucky, sold off when we die. Or at least, some of us lol. Do you think about this? I do. Too much.
Here are some key recommendations to produce this necessary result:
Rock steady, steady baby
And I shall hear, tho' soft you tread above me
'Little Gray', as his character's known, is the first to successfully complete all of the MMO's 986 achievements listed in the armory, reports MMO Champion.
To regain out identity, to discover our full potential and shed the abuse we have suffered, we must leave by many doors.
Online Piracy Act (SOPA) legislation, currently working their way through Congress, will damage the world's DNS system, cripple attempts to get better online security and violate free speech rights in the US constitution
1/25/12 Wednesday
There's a little boy in this house who LOVES to talk. He literally has something to say about everything. He is one continuous running commentary... observing everything he sees and talking incessantly about it.
Kiltgord Auditorium
Is there no way out of this cycle of election-andolon-coup?
If I'm getting to heaven from wherever I die
The hours for the exhibits at ALA this summer will be:
My most loyal advertising customer was Frank Goldsmith, who ran the camera shop downtown on the square. I was introduced by my grandfather, who used to have a ladder store nearby. They were about the same age and both named Frank. Mr. Goldsmith even looked a little like Grandpa; tall, lean, with sharp features and wispy white hair. His camera shop was pretty typical. Although he sold cameras, his business was mostly film and other supplies. I don’t recall anyone else working there except Mrs. Goldsmith, whose name I now know was Vickie. In the back, Mr. Goldsmith had a peculiar collection of home movie cameras and projectors. My grandfather had a home movie camera that he probably got from Mr. Goldsmith.
We knew we had just witnessed a miracle.
1/3 cup milk
My friend, Shawntele, at Rambling with Grace, has a new meme on Friday's called 5 Fave Friday. This week she is talking about comfort food, which I think is quite fitting with my memories of great grandma. These are the foods that I think about when I think about family and friends. They bring back memories of growing up. They make me think places I have been or places I want to go.
Heirloom Tomatoes can be enjoyed simply on a good whole grain or rustic bread, toasted. Drizzle the toast with good extra virgin olive oil (EVOO), cut thick slice of tomato with a serrated knife so as not to tear the meat of the tomato. Then drizzle again with the EVOO. Sprinkle with some dried basil. That's it. Enjoy.
“Throughout all of this, Jacob Zuma and the rest of the South African government are telling the rest of the world that South Africa is a Rainbow Democracy,” Anonymous says.
I turned, hit the hitch with my shin,
I understand this is selfish of me. God has shown me several times that Lila is not only a blessing to Andrew and me, but also to our families and especially to those that watch her every week. So I will continue to work (honestly, I hope and PRAY it's not forever) and sometimes I'll be sad and sometimes I'll be selfish...but i'm thankful Lila is loved and is changing lives in a way I never expected a crazy, curly haired, stinky feet, sometimes dirty, bubble loving, happy, talkative two year old could.
Second cabin passengers —— Men, 16 women, 92; children, 10. Total, 118.
Daniel (insert current Chinese name for his middle name) M. We hope he likes the name as much as we do. I've been floored by the number of friends who told me when I shared what we thought his name would be that have replied, 'I was going to suggest Daniel.' From what we read of his personality it sounds like he'll be agreeable.
- Have a family dinner for everyone one night a week, or better still a family night when you run a child friendly video.
Thank you to everyone for your support, mental, emotional, physical, and financial.
After a good rest and with food in our bellies, we started the descent towards Lingmell Gill. You would think that going down would be the easy part! I beg to differ! My legs were shaking that much I could hardly control them! It was extremely steep in parts! (I am such a wuss!)
Film photographs for me are snapshots of daily life, friends, feet, trying-to-finish-36-exposures shots, light leaks and a crazy lot of double exposures because I love them. You have to carefully compose your shot and be quick about it, and with that you get one snap. That one snap you treasure all the more.
But, the real point here is that on MY journey, in OUR story, I'm always learning, always open, always trying to be cognizant of my own shortcomings and proud of my accomplishments when it comes to my life and my family. In this case, I had a major, major shortcoming, a fatal flaw, and it had to be corrected. No more excuses, no more bullshit. I was backed into a corner that I prepared for myself and I had one option.
I like to talk a big game. I try to portray myself as a super Mom who doesn't take any flack from her three and a half year old, but it's time for me to come clean. It is with great disappointment that I admit to you today that I'm not as awesome as you thought. I'll pause briefly while you catch your breath.
SCSU is renting the space for the project through the Wedum foundation, a non-profit organization that provides elderly and college-student housing.
Celery sticks and assorted crackers
DW: Eight trillion dollars?
PPS. USC Gamecocks are NATIONAL CHAMPIONS! (in case you didn't already know…)
I can't find a video of the other version online, so you'll have to settle for the sample on Amazon. Take a listen, especially when the vocals start. Different. Cool. Love it.
Who - or what - is it your fortune to be nurturing these days?
For others it is like a handicap. A cruel joke of fate to be ironed out with every tool at their disposal. GHD, hair irons, gels, styling crèmes. Every hint of a curl, whispers of it must be eradicated. Ever notice though, how when their hair gets wet it’s still curly???
Samsung’s Galaxy S III is plastic, but powerful (photos)
While there I was also fortunate enough to be invited to attend a seminar presented by George Riedel, who was on great form. I have always appreciated that good glassware can make a real difference to my appreciation of a wine, but have always been slightly sceptical view of the Riedel approach. I shall write it up properly as it was extremely interesting as well as entertaining and I was very impressed by Herr Riedel – and not only because I received a free set of Vinum XL tasting glasses!
The results are comical and somewhat humiliating. I can brush my hair, and my teeth, and put on most items of clothing. However, a bra is going to be tricky. For fun I tried on a sports bra one handed and it worked out ok- but it's amazing how much twisting and jiggling, and adjusting is necessary to make it fit properly with TWO working hands- much less one. I'm sure I would have won a "funniest video" award if it had been on tape...thank GOD it IS NOT on tape!
Angie
one of America's most loved brands, is pleased to announce that their website has expanded! Their collections are best known for baby essentials from newborn to 4T, including sleepwear, gowns, cap and booties, sheets, hooded towels, Onesies® brand one piece underwear, and more.
The other day at quilt group the conversation turned to the current rash of reality cooking shows, where people try to put on a good meal but are eliminated week by week. Now I don't know how you all feel, but I find shows like that are nasty; they are not about the recipes and cooking, but more about "who can we get rid of this week? If we chuck off so-and-so we might lose viewers because they are on the side of the poor dear, but on the other hand we can't chuck off those two nice young blokes because they give the females in our audience something to watch and we don't want to lose our female audience" etc. As you may have gathered if you have read this far - I don't watch them. Give me a good murder/mystery story any day, I don't mind a bit of gore. To judge by the murder rate there can't be many people left alive now in some of those little English villages, can there?
Teagan and her classmate Elizabeth enjoyed recess and lunch together.
I saw everything so clearly now. Everything in my field of vision was vivid and sharp. I saw it all in ways I’d never seen before.
We say softly for a charm.
Episode 13 Recap:
Another way Lactantius depicts the philosophers as leading up to Christianity is by treating falsehood as a kind of world in its own right and the apprehension of falsehood as a separate matter from discerning truth. Then the pagan philosophers can be conceded to have done the easier task -- recognizing what is false -- without being able to find truth. This trope depends upon a reversal of classical predicates: now the false is evident and the true is hidden. Truth compels men with its essential force only when God releases it from concealment.
I'm going to stop moaning about how busy I am now, and tell you some positive things! There are quite a few.
AFTER NEWS BROKE LAST WEEK that the much-maligned Brooklyn House of Detention on Atlantic Avenue in Boerum Hill would once again be loading up with prisoners, the McBrooklyn blog dug into the jail's history and came out with a list of escapes from the facility and other sordid details. Highlights include "horse-trainer, inn-owner, embezzler and sensational murderer Buddy Jacobson" who escaped with the help of "Tony Two Suits," and a riot in 1970 in which the prisoners took 26 hostages. McBrooklyn
And walk among long dappled grass,
String Quartet in G Op. 18 No. 2
These photos were my first experiment with cross-processing (which kind of fit the theme of trying something different!). If you'd like to see better photos and descriptions of the cafe, hop over to Hello Sandwich!
I conducted the funeral ceremony. Mother Angelica’s community of sisters sang. The People of Life prayed, worshipped, mourned, and rejoiced in the hope of resurrection. As they honored the dead, they recommitted themselves to protect the living.
What are your favourite books and characters of Dickens? And what are your favourite film and TV adaptations?
**Days of drinking + partying + eating chips and cookies = a disaster waiting to happen for my blood sugar. The irregular meals, snacks, and cocktails have already begun and I feel as though I’m becoming addicted to snacks. I’m one of those people that doesn’t understand the concept of portion control when it comes to the sweet and salty. Give me a box of cookies or crackers and I will eat the entire thing in one sitting. So, my general rule is that I just don’t keep those types of foods in the house and if I want a snack, I have to make one, which usually deters me.
But whatever you choose to do one thing I am sure of is your children will really enjoy it! Let me know how does your garden grow?
To celebrate June's arrival,
Eric Dompierre has Down syndrome, but he’s been welcome to play sports with other kids in Ishpeming Michigan since he was in elementary school.
Thanks to our inimitable librarian Sara for arranging another stellar author visit. It is an embarrassment of riches at PS347!
But I was SO glad to get my own car back and drive home - to sit in front of the fire, with a hot cup of tea and my family ( human and cat :-) )
I stood in the back throughout most of the service mainly hoping that I wasn't in the way, until the head of the Hibernians asked me to go up to the front of the church so that I could help supervise the filing out at the end. So I walked up the center aisle alone during the closing prayer while the Knights of Columbus flanked me, about twenty on each side, a bunch of old guys in full uniform and swords drawn. When I got to the front of the church I made sure not to trip or fall backward or anything because I knew everyone would see me but at the end of the service Cardinal Egan came up to me and said, "Thanks for coming."
Having a good selection of difference shop fittings will give you the flexibility to design your shop so that different types of goods can be rearranged quickly and presented in the best possible way.
The ravenous expanded-universe has since fleshed out the details of all the cantina inhabitants, providing back-stories and species-names for every character (and sucking some of the fun and mystery out of them as well). Snaggletooth, for example, has since been decreed a "Snivvian" named "Zutton". I don't know--I kind of like the monsterish and straightforward "Snaggletooth."
Roll them into logs about 7 inches long.
Mr. Margaret Bassackwards: What I really don’t understand is how these people can’t know the situation of our family. We’ve been on twelve news shows, nineteen talk shows and the articles and internet stuff is too much to keep track of. People should really just respect the situation and not confuse the child.
I changed the photos in my header, switching out two photos and making them a bit larger. Because I made my header in picnik, which is closing soon (weep), I figured I better make the changes now.
The consequences for non-compliance with U.S. laws overseas are severe and can include large monetary fines per violation for businesses, and similar monetary fines and imprisonment for individuals. On top of that, in cases of significant violations, the consequences can include a denial of future export privileges and federal contract debarment, which is particular onerous for cybersecurity companies dependent primarily on business from U.S. government contracts.
www.hoshomccreesh.com
The second one, which, believe it or not, is a counterpart of my first choice. A bookend if you will… I removed my sharings from a forum I absolutely love. The duality of Light there did my further my own growth. I do not live my life in contradiction from itself. If I did, at the end of the day… I would go no further within my own evolution.
If today's post doesn't motivate you to go straight into your closet and get crazy excited to organize it, I don't know what will. I know that's exactly what I did when I saw the submission pop into my inbox. Straight to the closet, crazy excited to make it even better. So THANK YOU Carly for being so inspirational!
rocket down the backstretch: the beauty
and how the work she is doing MATTERS.
I AM WHO GOD SAYS I AM. I CAN DO WHAT GOD SAYS I CAN DO!
I recommend it for EVERYONE. Just listen at least!~
I'm obviously here as a beer fan. I want the beer to win. But on the basis of these two so far, I'm starting to wonder: is wine actually capable of matching with food at all? I'm so accustomed to looking for complementary flavours, I'm shocked by the boorish display of acidity here, too vulgar for an effective contrast. I adore these wines on their own, and resolve to stock up on them as soon as I can. But they need much bigger food than this to go with them. Even then, I'm not sure they would work. Is food and wine matching a myth?
The special 64-page, full-color album includes numbered spaces for every sticker and slots for team-picture puzzles, tributes to past Euro champions and more.
In my humble opinion, the absolute best part of being military spouse (besides the discounts and commissary of course- I kid) is the amazing friendships I have made. Friends that have done everything for me from help move a dining room table, to watching my pups, to cooking me dinner when Paul is gone, to coming over when I had to call the police after my car was broken into (good times, good times). Any hour, any day, anything, my friends are there. There’s really no better feeling than knowing I still have people that are there for me when Paul can’t be.
talked to Dee on the phone part of the time while I was
In the past month or so, there have been things going on in my workplace that have left me... feeling unsure. Unsure about why I'm here, how long I can keep this going, and what the future holds for me. Over the past 9 months, I've tried to find my way. I've sought advice from friends, I've prayed a lot, I've found ways to set limits. Improvements have been made but my heart was still heavy with the stress I was constantly carrying. My Job was my number one stress day in and day out. I would do great for a couple of days and then the same-old, same-old would bring me back to Stressville. It was impacting my relationship with my kids, my husband, my friends. I didn't feel like myself but I couldn't figure out how to get back to the Liz I had been.
will create about 82 layers of butter and dough. Wrap with parchment paper and chill it in refrigerator for about 2 hours. If you want you can chill for overnight too. I did with my second half of dough.
Good Morning Starshine....Oliver
Still, sleeping in a chair is not the best but this chair was WAY better than the first.
“Yes ma’am.” The nurse balances a pint of blood on her forearm, presenting it to the left of her patient. “This hemoglobin heavy product originates from a 2011 Madison Heights blood driv-”
I fear his shirt is an omen of what is to come. Those baby blues are going to be T-R-O-U-B-L-E. So while Sean is polishing his gun to keep Isabel’s dignity intact, I’m going to be staring down the harlots trying to corrupt my baby boy.
Have to tried these bars? They're 190 calories (5 weight watchers points) and loaded with protein. I'm trying to up my protein and stay fuller longer, and these babies seriously do the trick. I end my lunches with them because they're basically dessert too - double whammy in my book.
To be young, in France, and in love: fourteen year old Desiree can’t believe her good fortune. Her fiance, a dashing and ambitious Napoleon Bonaparte, is poised for battlefield success, and no longer will she be just a French merchant’s daughter. She could not have known the twisting path her role in history would take, nearly breaking her vibrant heart but sweeping her to a life rich in passion and desire.
You can buy – more expensive – branded goods like “Body Glide” and they work just as well, and according to the labels are better than plain Vaseline. Personal preference really. Some theories about one reacting to cold and water worse but I’ve never noticed. You can even go as far as nipple covers or guards, small plasters, though these can move and come off. For ladies, good sports bras can really help. Decent running tops help as well – as the materials don’t rub as much.
5. Recession ending? I'm thinking - not so fast yon economy seers. Paid a visit to chq to pull clothes for a shoot only to find my fave boutiques - Kohl and The Pink Rooms - have vacated the premises. Yikes!
I think if your timing requires that you leave them for 8 hours, roast at 200 instead (like I did the first time), it gives you more leeway, these seemed a little darker than I wanted though they are still quite tasty.
There is still time to enter this weeks challenge for your chance win a $20 gift certificate!
"What? Are you mad!? Don't call me that!" says the wife, "Why on earth do you need evidence?"
Of most of the images I do not know the source. Sorry for that.
45. In 1992’s Scent of Woman, Al Pacino repeatedly shouts “Hoo-ah.” “Hoo-ah” comes from the military acronym “HUA” which stands for “Heard, Understood, Acknowledged.”
The family homestead property included a garage that my grandfather ran. He purchased it from his father-in-law who first ran it. Scott pumped gas and as a great mechanic worked on many cars. I came to love the smell of gasoline.
Ended the evening with the shadows of Motown and the Funk Brothers. Oldies and my Uncle were like being wrapped in a warm blanket of love.
You must have at least three sources (not people you know, not in the SOJC in any way), and they may not all be a. from the same place or b. from the same kind of place (business/nonprofit/individual).
Olives, mushrooms, eggplant, and artichokes bottled in olive oil make quick and delicious additions to pasta.
7. Don’t Let Arrogance Make You Ignorant
Row 1- sc in 2nd ch from hook. (7)
Lastly, I wanted a quick word on the cover. The top version is the final used on the print edition, but I prefer the version below used on the review copy I got from BEA, which shows the train and Mercy looking quite determined. Jon Foster did both pieces quite well, but the below is much more appropriate to the story and character focused work.
I hope you all appreciate the playlist today. For those of you wondering what Bell Biv Devoe is doing on there, I give you the reason below…
What are your favorite digital mag reads? I'd love to add some to my list!
Hostile climates didn’t stop me
Muttley Dastardly LLP will be revealing Lawyerborg 2.0 in just seven days. That is all. Strength & Profits.
If you are the host, it is polite to offer your guest a cup of coffee or tea before showing them out. If you are the guest, it is most polite not to over extend your stay. Leave as quickly as possible.
I actually wrote a whole page on how this makes me feel. Not going to bore you with that (and really I dont have the time), but this makes me furious. Not that she says dad needs help, he does (and Toast is actually out there doing what she asked as we speak), but its the assumption that he doesnt have anything else to do (which is not at all true, I cant fucking breathe because there is not enough time to get everything done), and that even if he does, he needs to do what she said because its more important. I mean seriously, can she not ask for help, does she always have to demand things?
If you right-click on the photo, you can choose to open it in a new tab and you can look at it close up, or you can see the individual photos on flickr.
The little Jack Russell's Belly could be heard growling.
And who knows, maybe this opens the door for Rad to finally return to TCC :)
not to be outdone as far as rounded corners go, here's a 1962 post daryl spencer card
OUR EXPERIENCE
But today we have a much worse scenario. Circumstances overwhelm many people. There is no where to turn and so a person may give up and take his own life. Committing suicide is not the best option.
Without turning around
It ain't easy, growin' up in World War III
A big beer week for Beer Blokes last week and the highlight was the Mountain Goat Beer Dinner at Beer Deluxe.
When Clockworx Gaming launched at the beginning of this year, we found ourself pushing our company beyond what we only hoped to dream. Since then, we have received conformations of over 200 followers. This would include our ClockworxGaming.com site, Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, YouTube and all our other social media sites we are linked into. 5 months down the road, almost looking into a half a year now, we have had over a few thousand views, hits, and inquires regarding out posts, and we have you all to thank for that. But we struggle for more and need your help.
‘Sawdays Special Places to stay’
What's your favorite holiday? What snacks do you plan on making for Easter?
TRUMBO (2007)
Thomas said he has invited other members of the Senate Finance Committee to attend.
And so is your head!
As a young girl I was known to get up in the middle of the night to tidy my room because I couldn’t get to sleep in all the mess.
The combination downzoning/upzoning in Park Slope gets a mention. Investment in transit will help the city "turn about 300 acres of rail yards, auto repair shops, and parking lots in the Midtown Manhattan area known as the Hudson Yards into a mixed-use commercial, residential, and hospitality district."
It's also true that none of the big-ish things I accomplished this year--self-publishing my novel, getting fit (and losing fifteen pounds), confessing long-held, unsaid feelings--had anything to do with New Year's resolutions. I did these things because I was genuinely, deeply compelled to do them, and that just doesn't come from the turning of a calendar page.
F (note IV) = F - A - C (1st + 3rd + 5th note of the F scale)
In respect of roadside screening, Section 6c of The Railways and Transport Safety Act 2003 (as found under Schedule 7 of the act) provides the Police with the power to administer a roadside drug screening test. Once the technology is available it is possible that the FIT may become obsolete.
Compared to these high-minded concerns, the questions at issue in the Québec case, Canada (Procureur général) c. Charbonneau, 2012 QCCS 1701, might be rather pedestrian. At least it does not appear from the judgment that the federal government or the RCMP are opposed, as a matter of principle or policy, to Québec’s inquiry into the shady dealings in its construction industry and that industry’s unsavoury links with the provincial government. (Might this change if the inquiry uncovers links between that industry and the federal government, as a report by the Globe & Mail suggests it well may ?) But given the sheer volume of the information it is asked for, the RCMP is probably concerned about the costs of complying with the request, as it is with preserving the secrecy of its inquiry methods and sources. The court, however, suggests that these concerns are overstated and/or capable of being addressed by the RCMP’s co-operation with the commission of inquiry and with provincial police. As for the constitutional position, the court holds that a commission of inquiry set up pursuant to provincial law can validly subpoena the RCMP and request information in its possession, so long as it does not inquire about the RCMP’s administration. The RCMP, as the Supreme Court has held, is not part of the civil service, and does not enjoy the same immunities from provincial inquiries as the federal Crown or its servants.
About Antony Gormley:
One of the earlier of the Brazilian metal bands I'd heard back in the day. The band def wasn't as heavy, fast or thrashing as Sepultura or as extreme as the likes of Sarcofago. I was drawn to this by the album cover art, and the fact that a review I'd read of it back then mentioned that it was an amateurish Brazilian sounding Iron Maiden. Anyone who knows me knows I've always been a Maiden freak. When I got this I was sorta bummed on the fact that it wasn't really that Maiden influenced. Only the vox really resemble that type of power metal(Maiden, Fates Warning), the music is more straight forward Speed metal(although some of the double leads might have the MaidenVibe). This one is Definitely not for for everyone who follows my blog. Its very metal, and has very little influence from any other realm.
We all enjoyed our meals, and I’m sure we’ll eventually make a return visit to the Rose & Crown Dining Room. For Disney in-park eats, this is a very reasonably priced sit-down – most entrees were in the mid-to high teens, with the most expensive item (the sirloin) topping out at $22.99. The venue is fun, and just listening to the server’s accents is worth the visit alone (I’m a sucker for a UK accent)!
The ICI integration into Holland’s AkzoNobel was far from painless. Within days of the merger, they were jettisoning some of ICI’s assets — such as its adhesives and electronic materials activities, which were sold to a German competitor. Some 29 factories, including several in the UK, were closed, eliminating 3,500 jobs.
Today was a whirlwind. How did it go for you?
Save.
Her bracelets jingling to bind, above
Madison, WI 53072-0001
I was introduced to this product by a representative at Sephora. It was during the winter, and I had patches of dry skin on my forehead no matter how much I moisturized! At the time, I thought that my clariasonic was exfoliating enough for my skin, however this wasn’t the case. It was suggested I use an exfoliating product once or twice a week to buff away that dead skin. The rep used one of these pads on my skin in the store, and my skin was left refreshed, and baby soft! I was sold!
In all seriousness, I can't tell you what will happen, IF anything will happen, or what to do IF something happens. My COLLAPSE RPG is meant as a tool to explore potential Collapse scenarios or issues in a safe way, so read it and use it! Download it for FREE in the Department of Intelligence logo box to your right! If I can offer any advice:
Students will be gradually introduced to food that is less processed.
Detective Black has figured out that apparently Kilmer’s superpowers only work when the victims can hear him…well, that’s stupid, considering that most of the other victims couldn’t hear him when they died! So I think it’s safe to say the movie is just grasping for straws to provide us with more gore:
1. Commercials
This excerpt is quite near the end of the second story. It's lucky I didn't have to paste a page later - it would have given away the ending!
it’s only a matter of time, but worse still is someone from a neighbour to someone with a mind to will now be able to blackmail anyone who has anything they did not want to world to know.
Gingrich: poor children are lazy unless they
We have had two wonderful weekends in a row, with sun and two-digit temperatures (speaking Centigrades!)
There was no other incident the rest of the night. Still, Olivia had a hard time sleeping. The other girls in the cellblock made noise all night, hollering and talking trash. The hard mat was so uncomfortable. Of course it was cold.
That cannot hold
This was one of those times where I wished I could have gone faster.
Black boards with Silver titling to the Spine.
In conclusion, I learned to think outside the box when dealing with the elderly and their computers, I refrained from calling anyone a bastard, I kept the thermometers thoroughly clean, I prayed over green bananas and I taught someone who makes just a little bit more money than I do how to work the dishwasher.
As you should know by now this year's Afro Punk Festival has been indefinitely postponed due to Hurricane Irene, which is slated to hit late Saturday and all day Sunday.
The only sustainable way to escape this pressure cooker we call Earth without the deaths of untold hundreds of millions is to find somewhere else to go. Otherwise, the more of us there are, the less we matter. This isn’t a moral judgement , this isn’t apocalyptic doomsaying, this is math.
And Joan, were we having a three-way telephone conversation with Trafford? Where in I told them that the whole family knew you were writing this book for years? And that I was the one who encouraged you to write it in the first place? So why did you say that I told Trafford that I didn’t know you were writing it? Liar. – but that’s all you ever know how to do – LIE.
Or your boyfriend
The info-session at New Paltz has greatly improved since I was there with Elsa in 2009. Our admissions representative, Alcia, was clear, thorough and confident. She used a power point to speak about New Paltz and made the school seem very appealing, desriable and flexible. The average grade of the admitted student is A-, sort of tough for us!
XO. -K
I can hear the females calling to them, but I've also heard Dirk makes those same noises with his turkey call. It's just kind of funny to hear it in real life.
I shot bending down to the same low level, no tripod needed but probably would have helped!
and went through all sorts of heartaches
When’s the last time you took twelve days to tell your spouse something specific that you love or appreciate or admire about them?
Many times writing for a blog obligates you to be current as much as possible...I like to be current and fresh when I can make that a spontaneous and gratifying act. My career is not well disciplined and I don't manage my time very well. I was in Brazil for a month, from end of August to almost end of September dealing with personal issues and little bit of work.
November 10 Houston, TX House of Blues
99% of you will hate this. I'm okay with that.
twenty-four years since this body first produced a miracle;
(They go off.)
Ninth trip of the year. Eleventh if you count camp and a quick turn around trip to Prescitt Valley for my nieces birthday. Once to Michigan, Indiana and Hawaii. Three times to Cali. And now making my third trip to Vegas.
No, this is not a tale about my secret life as a gnome, living on a dusty shelf of an old cupboard .. hmmm … perhaps that might be an interesting idea to explore… but that’s for another time, and that is just the problem.
Triangle fold
Horror, laughter, and my mom wetting her special velvet Christmastime pants ensued.
your town do to rest? How about rain drops? Whirling Dervishes?
I get home and they tell us that they can't fix the garage until WED??? I'll be on a plane to CT on Wed. !! They were supposed to at least come and help us get our car out Monday. Hah. that didn't happen. So today I get a ride because my little legs are not up for a 12 mile round-trip stress again. Oh look, it's raining. Even better...
Thanks to everyone for their support this past year, I can't believe it's been a year of sharing God's word with all of you through these digi stamps. Thank you to my designers for the wonderful cards and projects you have made. I am truly thankful for all your creations.
While my sister was working for a professional cleaning company, she picked up an awesome cleaning tip from them. Instead of using a standard cleaning product, my sisters are now using laundry detergent to clean their bathroom sink and tub. Keep a small box of it handy under the sink (but away from the reach of little children) and sprinkle a bit onto a damp cloth. It works great for removing bathtub scum. Since it's much cheaper than the standard chemicals I'm switching too!
The children were interested in the way the seed split open for the plant to burst out. They thought it looked like a dragon throwing up.
You know what? No pity for her. She's a Shih-Tzu. They DESERVE to be humiliated. (And you know you agree with that statement.)
JOB 28:28
Open Market Value (OMV): $21,336
There was a time, of course, when puerility as debased as this was confined to the playground, to be mercifully lost in the breeze after a few guffaws among half-wits. Nowadays, alas, the playground is known as the Internet. This stuff gets written down and enjoys a longevity vastly disproportionate to its merit, among people who park their minds in the gutter.
Today was the first day my body wouldn't quite allow itself to be pushed as it has been the previous four sessions, but given my lack of quality sleep, I was impressed with myself simply for showing up. Today we did forty-five second sets of various exercises, from arms, to legs, to abs, compounded by 45 seconds in between of active rest. I know that active rest is an effective way to make the most of a workout, but today, it was particularly difficult. Sit-ups (not so bad), thigh-knee-toe reaches (also not so bad), and scissor kicks (very, very bad indeed) are a sampling of the active rest Chad offered us My School District Boot Campers.
Here's a funny thing. Part of the plot of The Faceless is based on the story of the Accrington Pals, who were wiped out on the first day of the Battle of the Somme: 1st July, 1916. As you can imagine, this and related subjects have been on my mind a lot over the course of the year as I pulled this monster together. But at last, so I thought, I could forget all about it.
I have made a few cards this week with stamps I bought recently from *whisper* QVC. I dont really buy off them often as they are expensive and when I do see something nice I wish I could buy just one or two - who needs 20 or 30 sheets of the same thing! Anyhoo, I thought that these stamps were lovely and being large, even I could colour them in. lol. I have used 7gypsies and echo park papers and a lovely new frame nestie. I've kept the cards quite simple. Hope you like K x
